






Fantasy Sports Global Ltd





















A new category of
digital innovation










What we do
Fantasy Sports Global Ltd is being underpinned by a convergence in gamification, mobile-digital proliferation and the increasing challenge of consumer engagement in the mobile age.




How we do it
FSG build immersing sports gaming technologies covering all major global sports and competitions including fantasy sport, footy tipping, sports lotto products and more.




Our team
We simply provide this immersing sports gaming technologies to enhance the sports enthusiast and build immersing sports gaming technologies covering all major global sports and competitions including fantasy sport, footy tipping, sports lotto products and more.


















About us
Fantasy Sports Global Ltd (FSG or the Company) is an Australian founded and based Technology and Sports Entertainment company, with ambitions and plans to dominate global markets in its scope and capacity.
FSG knows that Sports entertainment and engagement, especially Fantasy, is a rapidly growing and large global market opportunity that is not being exploited in a coherent manner.
Our opportunity is being underpinned by a convergence in gamification, mobile-digital proliferation and the increasing challenge of consumer engagement in the mobile age. Moreover, Sporting codes and Wagering companies globally are delivering very little differentiation in their digital product offerings. Fantasy Sport is proven to deliver all of the above dynamics as a revenue, engagement and consumer acquisition medium.
FSG is excited and compelled by the growth in current Fantasy Sports markets like UK, USA and Australia. Notwithstanding, emerging markets like India, China, Russia and Latin America have little or no Fantasy Sports adoption and present large-scale opportunity for FSG to quickly enter and capture market share.
                                        Markets like China and India have zero to little Sports Gaming and Entertainment solutions and combined have a clear target market of over 1 billion under-serviced sports fans.












Board & advisors





Peter Dykes
Non executive director
25 years’ experience in advising & building ASX-listed companies. Founded Tempo Australia Limited a mining services company based in Perth, non executive director for Capital Mining Ltd & a significant shareholder & facilitator of the following RTO’s on the ASX, Nexbiz, SkyFii Ltd, a big data & Internet business (formerly RKS) & YPB Ltd.





Daniel Simic
Founder & MD
Creator & owner of several successful businesses in the Tech, Engineering and Security sectors. Experienced start-up entrepreneur, strategic  thinker, strong team leadership & board experience with a passion for innovation Previous: TopBetta, Social Figures, New Era Group, Next Group, Honeywell.





Richard Sapsford
Non executive director
Richard is a highly successful private investor in Property Development , Tech & Maintenance businesses. Richard founded Australia’s largest private pest control company, Enviropest & sold to a Swedish firm, Anticimex.





Anthony Dunlop
Advisory board, strategy
Advisory Board, Strategy 20+ years of corporate advisory & investment experience in Australia, USA, Hong Kong & mainland China. Chief Investment Officer at Chapman Opportunities Limited, & a non-executive director of Digital Star Media, Capital Mining Limited & Digital4ge. Non-executive Chairman of waste-to-energy business Syn Dynamics Australia.





Mark Reisbeck
Advisory board, sports
15 years experience working in the sports profession globally. Mark started his career with IMG in London, working on major sports events across Europe, India & Sth Africa, including management of the early years of the IPL.  Mark specialises in the M’ment & implementation of major brands, sports sponsorship & media properties.





Scott Briggs
Advisory board, media
Extensive sports media & finance experience. Chief Executive Officer of Pacific Blue Capital, non-executive director at Digital Star Media,  Pace First, Southern Strategy. Previous roles include Commercial Director of FOX SPORTS Australia & Director of Commercial & Regulatory Affairs at Nine Entertainment.



















48 Epsom Road Zetland NSW 2017
















Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc Profile































 
    Use of this site is subject to, and your continued use constitutes your express agreement to be
    bound by, the 
    
     Terms of Use and 
     Privacy Statement.
    
    Any unauthorized use of this site is strictly prohibited.


XBRL Voluntary Filing Program
  Visit the CSAs XBRL website for information about XBRL and the voluntary program.
Click here for information about XBRL software and viewing XBRL financial statements.
  










Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc




Mailing Address:
#1305 - 1090 W. Georgia St.Vancouver, British ColumbiaV6E 3V7
Head Office Address:
#1305 - 1090 W. Georgia StreetVancouver, British ColumbiaV6E 3V7


Contact Name:
Nick DeMare
Principal Regulator: 
British Columbia


Business e-mail address:
ndemare@chasemgt.com
Short Form Prospectus Issuer:
No


Telephone Number:
604 685-9316
Reporting Jurisdictions:
British Columbia, Alberta


Fax Number:
604 683-1585
Stock Exchange:
TSX Venture


Date of Formation:
Dec 2 1985
Stock Symbol:
DFS


Jurisdiction Where Formed:
British Columbia
Auditor:
D & H Group LLP


Industry Classification:
other
General Partner:



CUSIP Number:
37955Q
Transfer Agent:
Computershare Investor Services Inc.


Financial Year-End:
Dec 31
Size of Issuer (Assets):
$5,000,001 to $25,000,000
































 
    Use of this site is subject to, and your continued use constitutes your express agreement to be
    bound by, the 
    
     Terms of Use and 
     Privacy Statement.
    
    Any unauthorized use of this site is strictly prohibited.




XBRL Voluntary Filing Program
  Visit the CSAs XBRL website for information about XBRL and the voluntary program.
Click here for information about XBRL software and viewing XBRL financial statements.
  





  LE Stock Quote - Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc   LE:CN      Ticker Change   LE:CN has changed to a new ticker symbol   CAD             Volume   0                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (CAD) (TTM)   -    Market Cap (CAD)   -    Shares Outstanding   -    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector Information Technology   % Price Change -0.09%     Industry Software & Services   % Price Change +0.14%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc provides and online draft fantasy sports platform. The Company operates in Canada.    Address  1090 West Georgia StreetSuite 1305Vancouver, BC V6E 3V7Canada   Phone  1-604-685-9316   Website   -     Executives Board Members    Darcy E Krogh  President/CEO    Harvey Lim  CFO/Secretary    Justin Shulman  Chief Operating Officer    Chris Neville  Chief Revenue Officer     Show More         Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc: CVE:DFS quotes & news – Google FinanceCookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookiesLearn moreGot itMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceGlobal Daily Fantasy Sports Inc(CVE:DFS)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc  (Public, CVE:DFS)  
Watch this stock
 




















0.435


-0.035
(-7.45%)





Jul 28 - Close


CVE
data delayed by 15 mins -
Disclaimer

Currency in CAD







Range

0.44 - 0.44



52 week

0.10 - 0.93



Open

0.44



Vol / Avg.

5,000.00/17,697.00



Mkt cap

20.63M



P/E

    -



Div/yield

    -



EPS

-0.04



Shares

47.43M



Beta

0.86



Inst. own

    -
































News





Relevance



Date











All news for Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc »

Subscribe






Advertisement


Key stats and ratios




Q1 (Mar '17)
2016


Net profit margin
-
-

Operating margin
-
-

EBITD margin
-
-

Return on average assets
-28.32%
-22.51%

Return on average equity
-29.12%
-23.39%

CDP Score
-

-


Screen stocks with similar metrics »

Address
1305-1090 Georgia St WVANCOUVER, BC V6E 3V7Canada+1-604-5635900 (Phone)+1-604-5688391 (Fax)















Settings |
Technicals |



Link to this view





Sources include SIX.




















Advertisement







Related companies





Show:


Most Recent Quarter


Most Recent Annual




Add or remove columns
Save changes
Cancel









More from FactSet »










Description




Global Daily Fantasy Sports Inc, formerly Lariat Energy Ltd, is a Canada-based company, which focuses on the business of the daily fantasy sports (DFS) industry. The Company focuses DFS business. The Company focuses on developing its DFS product for the international regulated markets. The Company, through Bellwether Technologies, Inc. (Bellwether), focuses on developing a software (the DFS Product), and provides maintenance and support of the Bellwether Platform and DFS Product (the Bellwether Support).


More from Reuters »








Officers and directors





James R. Penturn

Chairman of the Board






Darcy E. Krogh

President, Chief Executive Officer, Director






Harvey Lim

Chief Financial Officer, Corporate Secretary






Justin Shulman

Chief Operating Officer






Chris Neville

Chief Revenue Officer






Scott G. Emerson

Director






Michele N. Marrandino

Director






Nick DeMare CPA

Independent Director








Full list on Reuters »








Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - US - China - UKInformation is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service

﻿








	Fantasy Sports - BetConstruct - Products - G2E 2017
















































































Skip to main content











Search





Login to My Show


















October 3-5, 2017Sands Expo CenterLas Vegas, NV





 G2E Show Alerts
We have no alerts at this time, please check back for new G2E alerts!

× 









Home


American Gaming Association (AGA)


Integrated Resort Experience


Overview


Exhibit at IRE




Show Info


Register


Attendee Resources


Special Events


Emerging Leaders




Featured Show Locations


Exhibitor List


All Exhibitors


New Exhibitors




Product Gallery


Floor Plan


Show Specials


Supporters & Sponsors


Contact Us




Education


Overview


Education Sessions


View All Sessions


Monday Sessions


Tuesday Sessions


Wednesday Sessions


Thursday Sessions




Track Descriptions


Featured Speakers


National Center for Responsible Gaming (NCRG)




Exhibit


Want to Exhibit at G2E


International Exhibitors


Integrated Resort Experience Exhibitor Info




Current Exhibitor Info


New Exhibitors


Free Exposure at G2E


Media Kit


Lead Retrieval




Exhibitor Manual


EAC Form




Exhibitor Dashboard


Login


About


"How To" Guide




Live Floor Plan


Exhibitor Fact Sheet




Travel


G2E Travel Desk


Getting to the Sands


Experience Las Vegas!




Press


Media Registration


Online Media Center


Show Press Releases


Show Photos




My Show


Register







You are here

HomeGlobal Gaming Expo (G2E)-2017ProductsFantasy Sports











Fantasy Sports







Log in to add to favorites




Fantasy Sports
















						Category
					


Products and Services

                    iGaming & Other Gaming 
                    
                            

                                Fantasy Sports Gaming 
                            














Log in to contact company







Follow BetConstruct


Company Website


Follow BetConstruct on Twitter


Follow BetConstruct on Facebook


Follow BetConstruct on LinkedIn











BetConstruct

Booth:
                            

4823
                        
 







Sportsbook, Casino, Fantasy Sports, Social Casino, Virtual Sports 
BetConstruct is an award-winning developer and provider of online and land-based betting and
gaming solutions.
BetConstruct currently supports its partners from 14 global offices.
BetConstruct was ...BetConstruct is an award-winning developer and provider of online and land-based betting and
gaming solutions.
BetConstruct currently supports its partners from 14 global offices.
BetConstruct was recognized as the Winner of the iGaming Software Supplier award at the 2017
IGA adding to the EGR B2B Award for Best Customer Service received in 2016.More

View Company Profile






More products from this Company:
    



Social Gaming









Skill Games









VR Casino




















































Featured Website Exhibitors









©  Global Gaming Expo (G2E), and the American Gaming Association.

Home
Contact Us
Mailing List
Privacy Policy
Cancellation Policy
Sitemap
Careers
Reed Expo



Presented By



Organized By







 





We use cookies to operate this website and to improve its usability. Full details of what cookies are, why we use them and how you can manage them can be found by reading our Privacy & Cookies page. Please note that by using this site you are consenting to the use of cookies.

Don't show me this message again
















Fantasy Sports Global Ltd: Company Profile - Bloomberg




































































  









Feedback























fantasy sports global ltd
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Consumer Discretionary
Industry: Gaming, Lodging & Restaurants
Sub-Industry: Casinos & Gaming





Corporate Information
Address:



Phone:
-


Fax:
-























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data




































Market Research Reports, Global Fantasy Sports Market 2016-2020





























Home  | Contact Us |
			  			    Log In



 


(888) 789-6604

















All Categories
Automotive and Transportation
Banking & Finance
Computer &  IT
Consumer Packaged Goods 
Consumer Retail
Electronics & Security
Energy, Utility and Renewable
Internet
Manufacturing & Industry
Pharma & Healthcare
Sustainable Technology
Telecom
Travel & Lifestyle








Advanced search





Account Detail

0 items in basket



Order History
Total $


Saved Searches
View Basket 



 




Automotive and Transportation  
      




Automotive and Transportation

Aftermarket
Commercial Vehicles
Powertrain
Safety
Telematics




Freight
Logistics & Shipping
Rail
Intelligent transport systems
Airway
Public Transport
Company profiles




Banking & Finance
      




Banking & Finance

Retail Banking
Insurance





Wealth management
Banking Services




Consumer Packaged Goods 
      




Consumer Packaged Goods

Food
Beverages - Non-Alcoholic
Personal Care




Beverages - Alcoholic
Household Products
Company Profiles




Computer  &  IT
      




Computer  &  IT

Software
Cloud Computing
IT Services




IT Hardware Computer Products Distribution & Support
Company Profiles Country Overview (Computing & Electronics)




Consumer & Retail
      




Consumer & Retail

Clothing
Supermarkets
Electricals and Electronics

 

Housekeeping and Gardening Supplies
Food and Drink Specialists
Company Profiles




Energy, Utility and Renewable
      




Energy, Utility and Renewable

Utilities
Commodity
Natural Resources




Renewable Energy
Company profiles








Electronics & Security
      




Electronics & Security

Electronic Devices
Automatic Identification


Surface Mount Technology (SMT)
Company profiles




Internet
      




Internet

Advertising
Company Profiles
E-Commerce




Gaming
Popular Culture
Social Media




Manufacturing  &  Industry
      




Manufacturing  &  Industry

Industry
Automation & Process Control




Miscellaneous Manufacturing
Company Profiles




Pharma & Healthcare
      




Pharma Healthcare

Clinical Diagnostics
Biotechnology
Healthcare and Life Sciences IT




Medical Devices
Pharmaceuticals
Company Profiles




Sustainable Technology
      




Sustainable Technology

Country Overviews (Transport & Travel)
Maritime
Service Stations
Transport & Travel
Air
Bus




Company Reports (Transport & Travel)
Freight
Logistics & Shipping
Misc. Transport & Travel
Public Transport
Railway
Roads




Telecom
      




Telecom

Telecommunication  &  Broadband 3G / WiMAX
Conferencing  &  Collaboration
Mobile  &  Wireless




Network infrastructure  &  Security
Emerging technologies
Retail Systems
Enterprise solutions
Company Profiles




Travel & Lifestyle
	   




Travel & Lifestyle

Hotels
Travel Agencies
Modes of Travel




Art
Leisure
Luxury Brands














Global Fantasy Sports Market 2016-2020





Publication Date
Oct 2016



Product Type
Report


Pages
67


Single User License help
$
					2500.00					   


Site User License help
$
                      3000.00


Corporate User License help
$
                      4000.00









 














Reportstack.com does not charge credit card fee, transaction charges, extra tax or VAT on any purchase.






Summary
Table of Contents

Related Products
Speak with an expert




About Fantasy SportsFantasy sports is a type of online game where participants assemble virtual teams of professional players of a particular sport. Such teams then compete based on their actual statistical performances in the actual games being played by them. Based on this performance of the chosen players of the fantasy team, the points for the team are compiled and totaled. The point system for fantasy leagues are calculated by a league commissioner, or may also be calculated by tracking actual results of the professional sport.Technavio’s analysts forecast the global fantasy sport to grow at a CAGR of 10.16% during the period 2016-2020.Covered in this report The report covers the present scenario and the growth prospects of the global thoracic surgery market for 2016-2020. To calculate the market size, the report considers the revenue generated from the league fee paid by end-users to participate in fantasy sports events.The market is divided into the following segments based on geography: • North America • Europe• APAC• ROWTechnavio's report, Global Fantasy Sports Market 2016-2020, has been prepared based on an in-depth market analysis with inputs from industry experts. The report covers the market landscape and its growth prospects over the coming years. The report also includes a discussion of the key vendors operating in this market. Key vendors • CBS• DraftKings• ESPN• FanDuel• Yahoo Other prominent vendors • Ballr• Bovada• FantasyAces• FantraxMarket driver • Direct control over operations and increased social media optimizations• For a full, detailed list, view our report Market challenge • Increasing traction of mobile video games and traditional e-sports• For a full, detailed list, view our report Market trend • Partnerships between pro leagues and daily fantasy vendors• For a full, detailed list, view our report Key questions answered in this report • What will the market size be in 2020 and what will the growth rate be?• What are the key market trends?• What is driving this market?• What are the challenges to market growth?• Who are the key vendors in this market space?• What are the market opportunities and threats faced by the key vendors?• What are the strengths and weaknesses of the key vendors? You can request one free hour of our analyst’s time when you purchase this market report. Details are provided within the report.Companies MentionedCBS, DraftKings, ESPN, FanDuel, Yahoo, Ballr, Bovada, FantasyAces, Fantrax. 


PART 01: Executive summary• HighlightsPART 02: Scope of the report• Market overview• Top-vendor offeringsPART 03: Market research methodology• Research methodology• Economic indicatorsPART 04: Introduction• Key market highlightsPART 05: Market landscape• Market overview• Market size and forecast• Five forces analysisPART 06: Market segmentation by product• Global fantasy soccer market• Global fantasy baseball market• Global fantasy basketball market• Global fantasy football market• Global other fantasy sports marketPART 07: Geographical segmentation• Fantasy sports market in North America• Fantasy sports market in Europe• Fantasy sports market in APAC• Fantasy sports market in ROWPART 08: Market drivers• Direct control over operations and increased social media optimizations• Increasing participation in fantasy sports• Widespread reach of internetPART 09: Impact of driversPART 10: Market challenges• Perceptions about fantasy sports• Increasing traction of mobile video games and traditional e-sportsPART 11: Impact of drivers and challengesPART 12: Market trends• Increased traction for daily fantasy leagues• Increasing strategic advertising expenditure and media partnerships• Partnerships between pro leagues and daily fantasy vendorsPART 13: Vendor landscape• Competitive scenario• Major vendors• CBS• DraftKings• ESPN• FanDuel• Yahoo• Funding received by vendors• Other prominent vendorsPART 14: Appendix• List of abbreviationsPART 15: Explore TechnavioList of ExhibitsExhibit 01: Global fantasy sports market by product typeExhibit 02: List of countries by geographyExhibit 03: Product offeringsExhibit 04: Overview of the global fantasy sports marketExhibit 05: Global fantasy sports market 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 06: Five forces analysisExhibit 07: Global fantasy sports market by product typeExhibit 08: Global fantasy sports market by product typeExhibit 09: Global fantasy soccer market 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 10: Global fantasy baseball market 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 11: Global fantasy basketball market 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 12: Global fantasy football market 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 13: Global other fantasy sports market 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 14: Geographical segmentation of the global fantasy sports market 2015-2020Exhibit 15: Fantasy sports market in North America 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 16: Spending by fantasy sports players in North AmericaExhibit 17: Fantasy sports market in Europe 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 18: Fantasy sports market in Europe by product segmentation 2014Exhibit 19: Fantasy sports market in APAC ($ billions)Exhibit 20: Fantasy sports market in ROW 2015-2020 ($ billions)Exhibit 21: Number of fantasy sports participants in North America (millions)Exhibit 22: Number of days in a month players participating in DFS leagues in North America 2015Exhibit 23: Activities undertaken by fantasy sports participants using their mobile devices 2015Exhibit 24: Impact of driversExhibit 25: Impact of drivers and challengesExhibit 26: Major vendors of the global fantasy sports market 2015Exhibit 27: Key competitors: Radar chart analysisExhibit 28: CBS: Business segmentation 2015Exhibit 29: CBS: Product segmentsExhibit 30: DraftKings: Product segmentsExhibit 31: ESPN: Product segmentsExhibit 32: FanDuel: Product segmentsExhibit 33: Yahoo: Business segmentation and geographical segmentation 2015Exhibit 34: Yahoo: Product segments






Title
Date
Price






Bancassurance in Angola: Current State and Future Perspectives to 2020


By Finaccord

Finaccord’s report titled Bancassurance in Angola: Current State and Future Perspectives to 2020, plus the PartnerBASE™ and market data file that accompany it, provides comprehensive and detailed 						...Read More




Sep 2014
 $651.75






Europe Laser Marking Machine Industry 2016 Market Research Report


By QYResearch

The Europe Laser Marking Machine Industry 2016 Market Research Report is a professional and in-depth study on the current state of the Laser Marking Machine industry.

The report provides a basic over						...Read More




May 2016
 $3600.00






Europe Laser Scanner Industry 2016 Market Research Report


By QYResearch

The Europe Laser Scanner Industry 2016 Market Research Report is a professional and in-depth study on the current state of the Laser Scanner industry.

The report provides a basic overview of the indu						...Read More




Jun 2016
 $3600.00






Europe Water Softeners Industry 2016 Market Research Report


By QYResearch

The Europe Water Softeners Industry 2016 Market Research Report is a professional and in-depth study on the current state of the Water Softeners industry.

The report provides a basic overview of the 						...Read More




May 2016
 $3600.00






Global High-Frequency Welding Equipment Market Research Report 2016


By QYResearch

Notes:
Production, means the output of High-Frequency Welding Equipment
Revenue, means the sales value of High-Frequency Welding Equipment

This report studies High-Frequency Welding Equipment in Glob						...Read More




Dec 2016
 $2900.00






Global Management Consulting Service Market Size, Status and Forecast 2022


By QYResearch

This report studies the Management Consulting Service market status and outlook of global and major regions, from angles of players, regions, product and end Application/industries; this report analyz						...Read More




Apr 2017
 $3300.00






Global Multi-Channel Optical Power Meter Sales Market Report 2016


By QYResearch

Notes:
Sales, means the sales volume of Multi-Channel Optical Power Meter
Revenue, means the sales value of Multi-Channel Optical Power Meter

This report studies sales (consumption) of Multi-Channel 						...Read More




Nov 2016
 $4000.00





 Company Profile_PT Telekomunikasi Indonesia, Tbk (Telkom Indonesia)

By Smart Research Insights

DescriptionThis profile provides a comprehensive factual analysis of the company, its business segments and offerings and the historical evolution of its operations. The report also highlights the fin						...Read More




Mar 2015
 $50.00





 GLOBAL WIRELESS SENSORS MARKET RESEARCH AND ANALYSIS, 2015-2021

By Orion Market Research

Market InsightsThe market is expected to grow at a CAGR of 20.5% from 2016-2021, owing to increasing demand for miniaturization and innovations in wireless sensing technologies. Rising number of appli						...Read More




Sep 2016
 $3500.00





"Global 
Plastics Mill Machinery Market Research Report 2017"


By QYResearch

Notes:
"Production, means the output of Plastics Mill Machinery"
"Revenue, means the sales value of Plastics Mill Machinery"

"This report studies Plastics Mill Machinery in Global market, especially 						...Read More




Jan 2017
 $2900.00











 
* Required field


Name *



E-mail *



Telephone 





Company  * 



Country *

Select
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Automobile
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegowina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote D'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Deutschland
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
France, Metropolitan
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard and Mc Donald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran (Islamic Republic of)
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Korea, Republic of
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Lao People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia, The Former Yugoslav Republic of
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova, Republic of
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia (Slovak Republic)
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
Spain
Sri Lanka
St. Helena
St. Pierre and Miquelon
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen Islands
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State (Holy See)
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands (British)
Virgin Islands (U.S.)
Wallis and Futuna Islands
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe



Query  






 








 
 

 



 




Published By :  Infiniti Research Ltd 











					  For support please contact:
US Toll Free
+1 888-789-6604


Asia Pacific
+91-9893555190 
							
							







 














 











To receive alerts about an update, future offers and discounts on this report, signup here.Email ID











 









 Companies
A
B
C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 


 Countries

A
B C
D
E
F
G
H
I J
K L
M N
O P
Q R
S T
U V
W X
Y Z 













About Us | 
	  Contact Us | 
	  FAQ's |
	  Terms and Conditions | 
	  Privacy Policy | 
	  Return Policy



Forbes WelcomeCLOSE   More Options   Quote of the Day  Develop a curiosity overload. Kevin Harrington, Entrepreneur    


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Global Fantasy Sports























Think you know  fantasy sports?












                        Real money is at stake
                    

                        Lots of winners, lots of payouts - don't let your friends beat you!
                    









Seth Markman 
ESPN

                                        “ We actually kind of take the philosophy now that
                                        the fantasy player is our audience.”
                                    







Joe Drape
New york times

                                        “The fantasy sports industry has been
                                        growing rapidly, with hundreds ofthousands of dollars can be won”
                                    







Lora Kolodny
the wall street journal

                                        “ There's a new obsession taking hold in the world
                                        of fantasy sports online: daily games played for
                                        cash”
                                    











                        Choose from 
                        hundreds of 
                        competition rooms
                    

                        Great sports and many competitions to choose from
                        in unique games with lots of winners.
                    



EPL



PGA TOUR



NBA



MLB



NFL









                        Talk smack with your friends
                    

Unique fantasy games for fans and friends.
Play head-2-head, privately or with other fans.
No season-long commitment.
Pick your favorite sport and be off to the races in minutes.








                        Get started Easily!
                    


1

Pick your favorite game





2

Choose game  strategy





3

Challenge  your friends





4


                                Watch the game in real time
                            









                        Sports
                    

                        Lots of winners, lots of payouts – don't let your friends 
                        gets the better of you!
                    

























                            PLAY FROM THE  DEVICE OF YOUR  CHOICE
                        

                            Whenever you want to.  From wherever you might be.
                        
















Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Website Privacy Policy

Last updated: August 11, 2015.


                            The Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ website located at  golf.globalfantasysports.com
                         (the “Site”),
                            is operated by Global Fantasy Sports Inc.
                            (“Global Fantasy Sports Golf™,” “we,” “our” or “us”).
                            This Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Website Privacy Policy
                            (“Privacy Policy”) covers our treatment of
                            personal information and other information that we collect when an end-user:
                            (a) accesses or use the Site; and/or (b) registers as a user (“User”)
                            of the Site, which provides you with access to: (i) the Site’s viewable
                            Content and other material; (ii) interactive areas of the Site
                            (where and when available), such as blog and comment sections, that
                            enable Users to interact with other Users, as well as Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            personnel (“Interactive Services”); and (iii) an array of daily and
                            weekly golf-themed fantasy sports-based games (collectively, “Contests”)
                            involving golfers associated with the Professional Golfers Association of
                            America (“PGA®”) or any other professional golf organization designated
                            by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ (each, an “Association”). The Site, Content, Interactive
                            Services and Contests are referred to, collectively herein, as
                            the “Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings.”
                        

                            Capitalized terms not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth
                            in the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Website Terms and Conditions (“Terms and Conditions”).
                             IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO TERMS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY IN THEIR ENTIRETY,
                                YOU MAY NOT ACCESS OR OTHERWISE USE THE HOW FAR GOLF™ OFFERINGS 



Your California Privacy Rights

                            If you are a resident of the State of California and would like to
                            learn how your “personal information” (as defined in the Shine the
                            Light Law, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.83) is shared with third parties,
                            what categories of personal information that we have shared with third
                            parties in the preceding year, as well as the names and addresses of
                            those third parties, please e-mail us at:
                            support@globalfantasysports.com


                            Further, if you are a resident of the State of California and
                            would like to opt-out from the disclosure of your personal information
                            to any third party for marketing purposes, please e-mail us at:
                            support@globalfantasysports.com
                            Please be advised that where California State residents opt-out
                            from permitting their personal information to be shared, such
                            individuals may still receive selected offers directly from us,
                            in accordance with applicable law.
                        


Personal Information Collected

                            For the purposes of this Privacy Policy, “personal information”
                            shall mean individually identifiable information from or about an
                            individual. We collect personal information when you access certain
                            of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and complete the required registration
                            form (collectively, “Form”). The information that you must supply on
                            the Form may include, without limitation, your: (a) full name; (b)
                            state and country of residence; (c) e-mail address
                            (including the e-mail address associated with your PayPal® account,
                            where applicable); (d) password; (e) billing/mailing address
                            (where entering a Paid Contest, as defined below); (f) credit card
                            information (where selected as your preferred payment method); (g)
                            Social Security Number (for potential Prize winners); (h) picture
                            proof of identification, which may include a driver’s license,
                            passport, voting card or similar government issued identification
                            (for potential Prize winners); and/or (i) any other information
                            requested on the applicable Form. In addition, Users may register
                            for an Account by and through their Facebook® accounts, Google+®
                            accounts or any other means designated by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™.
                            Where you register via your Facebook® account, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will
                            have access to your: (i) Facebook® public profile; (ii) the e-mail
                            address associated with your Facebook® account; and (iii) any and
                            all other information made available to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ by and through
                            your Facebook® account. Where you register via your Google+® account,
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will have access to your: (A) basic Google+® profile
                            information; (B) the e-mail address associated with your Google+®
                            account; and (C) any and all other information made available to
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ by and through your Google+® account.
                            For purposes of this Privacy Policy, items (f), (g) and (h) in
                            the preceding sentence shall be considered “Sensitive Information.”
                        


Use of Personal Information

                            By submitting your personal information by and through the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, you agree that we may share, sell, rent,
                            lease or otherwise provide that personal information
                            (other than Sensitive Information) to any third party for any
                            purpose permitted by law, and we may work with other businesses
                            to bring selected retail opportunities to our Users.
                            These businesses and third parties may include, but are not
                            limited to: (a) providers of direct marketing services and applications,
                            including lookup and reference, data enhancement, suppression and
                            validation; (b) e-mail marketers; (c) telemarketers (where permitted
                            by applicable law); and (d) direct marketers. We will also use your
                            personal information to send you promotional messages regarding
                            various Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ products and/or services, as well as third
                            party products and/or services that we think may be of interest to you.
                        

                            We may also employ other companies and individuals to perform certain
                            functions on our behalf. Examples include sending direct and electronic
                            mail, removing duplicate information from User lists, analyzing data and
                            providing marketing analysis. The agents performing these limited
                            functions on our behalf shall have access to our Users’ personal
                            information as needed to perform these functions for us, but we do
                            not permit them to use User personal information for other purposes.
                        

                            We will also use your personal information for customer service,
                            to provide you with information that you may request, to customize
                            your experience with the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and/or to contact
                            you when necessary in connection with your use of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings.
                            We may also use your personal information for internal business purposes,
                            such as analyzing and managing our business including, without limitation,
                            the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings. We may also combine the information we have
                            gathered about you with information from other sources.
                        

                            By submitting your personal information by and through the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Offerings, you agree that such act constitutes an inquiry and/or application
                            for purposes of the Amended Telemarketing Sales Rule (16 CFR §310 et seq.),
                            as amended from time to time (the “Rule”) and applicable state do-not-call
                            regulations. As such, notwithstanding that your telephone number may be
                            listed on the Federal Trade Commission’s Do-Not-Call List, and/or on
                            applicable state do-not-call lists, we retain the right to contact you
                            via telemarketing in accordance with the Rule and applicable state
                            do-not-call regulations.
                        

                            Where you provide “prior express written consent” within the meaning of
                            the Telephone Consumer Protection Act (47 USC § 227), and its
                            implementing regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission
                            47 CFR § 64.1200), as amended from time-to-time (“TCPA”), you consent
                            to receive telephone calls, including artificial voice calls,
                            pre-recorded messages and/or calls (including SMS text messages)
                            delivered via automated technology, to the telephone number(s)
                            that you provided. Please note that you are not required to
                            provide this consent in order to obtain access to the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings,
                            and your consent simply allows Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ to contact you via these means.
                            Further, you agree that we reserve the right to share, sell, rent, lease
                            and/or otherwise distribute your mobile telephone and other mobile data
                            with/to any third-party for any and all non-marketing uses permitted by
                            this Privacy Policy and applicable law.  Please be advised that by
                            agreeing to this Privacy Policy, you are obligated to immediately
                            inform us if and when the telephone number that you have previously
                            provided to us changes.


                            We reserve the right to release current or past personal
                            information (including Sensitive Information): (i) in the event
                            that we believe that the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings are being or
                            have been used in violation of the Terms and Conditions or to
                            commit unlawful acts; (ii) if the information is subpoenaed;
                            provided, however, that, where permitted by applicable law, we
                            shall provide you with e-mail notice, and opportunity to challenge
                            the subpoena, prior to disclosure of any personal information
                            pursuant to a subpoena; or (iii) if we are sold, merge with a
                            third party, are acquired or are the subject of bankruptcy proceedings;
                            provided, however, that if Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is involved in a bankruptcy
                            proceeding, merger, acquisition or sale of all or a portion of its assets,
                            you will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on the
                            Site of any change in ownership or uses of your personal information,
                            as well as any choices that you may have regarding your personal information.
                        

                            You hereby consent to the disclosure of any record or communication
                            to any third-party when we, in our sole discretion, determine the
                            disclosure to be appropriate including, without limitation,
                            sharing your e-mail address with third-parties for suppression
                            purposes in compliance with applicable law including the
                            CAN-SPAM Act of 2003, as amended from time to time.
                            Users should also be aware that courts of equity, such as U.S.
                            Bankruptcy Courts, might have the authority under certain
                            circumstances to permit personal information to be shared or
                            transferred to third parties without permission.
                        


Credit Card and PayPal® Transactions

                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ utilizes third party service providers to provide
                            credit card and PayPal® payment processing services.
                            If you choose to fund your Account by and through the Site, the
                            Active Credit Card information provided, or PayPal® account
                            registration information, depending on your preferred payment
                            method, will either be collected directly by such third party
                            service provider or PayPal®, as applicable, or we will share
                            that payment information with our contracted third party service
                            provider(s) or PayPal®, as applicable. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ requires
                            that its third party payment processing service provider(s)
                            has/have in place privacy policies and practices consistent with
                            this Privacy Policy; provided, however, that we cannot guarantee
                            the privacy practices of our third party payment processing service
                            provider(s) including, without limitation, PayPal®.
                        


Non-Personal Information Collection and Use

IP Addresses/Browser Type


                            We may collect certain non-personally identifiable information about
                            you when you visit many of the pages of the Site. This non-personally
                            identifiable information includes, without limitation, the type of
                            browser that you use (e.g., Safari, Chrome, Internet Explorer), your
                            IP address, the type of operating system that you use (e.g., Windows or iOS)
                            and the domain name of your Internet service provider (e.g., Verizon, AT&T).
                            We use the non-personally identifiable information that we collect to
                            improve the design and content of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and to enable
                            us to personalize your Internet experience. We also may use this information
                            in the aggregate to analyze usage of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings.
                        

Cookies 


                            When a User visits the Site, we send one (1) or more cookies and/or
                            gif files (collectively, “Cookies”) to assign an anonymous, unique
                            identifier to the applicable User’s computer or other device.
                            A Cookie is a piece of data stored on your hard drive containing
                            non-personally identifiable information about you. Cookies have
                            many benefits to enhance your experience at the Site.
                            To find out more about Cookies, please visit www.cookiecentral.com.
                            We use Cookies to improve the quality of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings,
                            including for storing user preferences and tracking Site-user trends
                            (such as pages opened and length of stay at the Site).
                        

                            Most Internet browsers are initially set up to accept Cookies,
                            but you can reset your browser to refuse all Cookies or to indicate
                            when a Cookie is being sent. To disable and reject certain Cookies,
                            follow the instructions associated with your Internet browser.
                            Even in the case where a user rejects a Cookie, he or she may still
                            use the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings; provided, however, that certain
                            functions of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings may be impaired or rendered
                            inoperable if the use of Cookies is disabled. We reserve the right
                            to retain Cookie data indefinitely.
                        

Behavioral Tracking/Tracking Cookies 


                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ uses Cookies and other technology on the Site that
                            tracks end-users’ activities after they leave the Site for advertisement
                            retargeting purposes, and otherwise. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ uses this tracking
                            technology to target the applicable end-user with advertisements regarding
                            the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and other products and/or services that
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ thinks might be of interest to the applicable end-user.
                            In addition, third parties such as those set forth below, may engage
                            in a similar form of behavioral tracking of end-users that visit the Site.
                        

                            End-users may be able to disable some or all of this tracking activity
                            by utilizing the “Do Not Track” setting or similar options within most
                            major Internet browsers. To the greatest extent permissible under applicable law,
                            we are not responsible for the tracking practices of third parties
                            in connection with the Site. To opt-out of behavioral tracking
                            conducted by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, please Click Here
                        


Google Inc. (“Google”)

                            Google, as a third party vendor, uses Cookies to serve ads on our
                            Site and other online venues, based on Users’ visits to our Site
                            and/or other websites on the Internet. You may opt-out of Google’s
                            tracking as set forth below:
                        
Google’s Use of the DoubleClick Cookie

                            You may opt out of the use of the DoubleClick Cookie for interest-based
                            advertising by visiting the Google Ads Settings
                             
                            (http://www.google.com/ads/preferences) 
                        
Google AdWords 

                            You can opt-out of Google Analytics for Display Advertising and
                            customize the Google Display Network ads by visiting the Google
                            Ads Settings
                             
                            (http://www.google.com/settings/ads) page.
                            Google also recommends installing the Google Analytics Opt-out
                            Browser Add-on
                             
                            (https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout) for
                            your web browser. Google Analytics Opt-Out Browser Add-on provides
                            Users with the ability to prevent their data from being collected
                            and used by Google Analytics.
                        

                            For more information on the privacy practices of Google, please
                            visit the Google Privacy & Terms
                             (http://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/)  web page.
                        


AdRoll

                            The AdRoll behavioral tracking/remarketing service is provided by
                            Semantic Sugar, Inc. (“AdRoll”). You can opt-out of AdRoll
                            remarketing by visiting this AdRoll Advertising Preferences
                             (http://info.evidon.com/pub_info/)  web page.
                        


Perfect Audience

                            The Perfect Audience behavioral tracking/remarketing service is
                            provided by NowSpots Inc. (“Perfect Audience”). You can opt-out of
                            Perfect Audience remarketing by visiting these pages:
                            Platform Opt-out
                             (http://pixel.prfct.co/coo) 
                            and Partner Opt-out (http://ib.adnxs.com/optout).
                        

                            For more information on the privacy practices of Perfect Audience,
                            please visit the Perfect Audience Privacy Policy & Opt-Out
                             
                            (https://www.perfectaudience.com/privacy/index.html) 
                            web page.
                        


AppNexus

                            The AppNexus remarketing service is provided by AppNexus Inc. (“AppNexus”).
                            You can opt-out of AppNexus remarketing by visiting
                            the Privacy & the AppNexus Platform
                             (http://www.appnexus.com/platform-policy-choices) 
                            web page.
                        

                            For more information on the privacy practices of
                            AppNexus, please visit the AppNexus Platform Privacy
                            Policy
                             (http://www.appnexus.com/platform-policy) 
                            web page.
                        


Aggregate Data

                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to transfer and/or sell aggregate
                            or group data about Users of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings for lawful purposes.
                            Aggregate or group data is data that describes the demographics, usage or other
                            characteristics of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings Users as a group, without
                            disclosing personally identifiable information.
                        


Third-Party Websites

                            The Site may contain links to third-party owned and/or
                            operated websites including, without limitation, the Third Party
                            Provider websites. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not responsible for the privacy
                            practices or the content of such websites. In some cases, you may
                            be able to make a purchase through one of these third-party websites.
                            In these instances, you may be required to provide certain information,
                            such as a credit card number, to register or complete a transaction
                            at such website. These third-party websites have separate privacy and
                            data collection practices and Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ has no responsibility or
                            liability relating to them.
                        


Communications

                            We may use your Personal Information to contact you
                            with newsletters, marketing or promotional materials
                            and other information that may be of interest to you.
                            You may opt out of receiving any, or all, of these
                            communications from us by following the unsubscribe
                            link or instructions provided in any email we send.
                        


Security
We endeavor to safeguard and protect our Users’ personal information.
                            When Users make personal information available to us, their personal
                            information is protected both online and offline (to the extent that
                            we maintain any personal information offline).
                            Where our registration/application process prompts Users to enter
                            Sensitive Information, and when we store and transmit such Sensitive
                            Information, that information is encrypted with advanced TLS
                            (Transport Layer Security).
                        
Access to your personal information is strictly limited, and we take
                            reasonable measures to ensure that your personal information is not
                            accessible to the public. All of our Users’ personal information is
                            restricted in our offices, as well as the offices of our third party
                            service providers. Only employees or third party agents who need
                            the personal information to perform a specific job are granted access
                            to personal information. Our employees are dedicated to ensuring
                            the security and privacy of all User personal information.
                            Employees not adhering to our firm policies are subject to
                            disciplinary action. The servers that we store personal
                            information on are kept in a secure physical environment.
                            We also have security measures in place to protect the loss, misuse
                            and alteration of personal information under our control.
                        
Please be advised, however, that while we take every reasonable
                            precaution available to protect your data, no storage facility,
                            technology, software, security protocols or data transmission
                            over the Internet or via wireless networks can be guaranteed
                            to be 100% secure. Computer hackers that circumvent our security
                            measures may gain access to certain portions of your personal
                            information, and technological bugs, errors and glitches may cause
                            inadvertent disclosures of your personal information; provided,
                            however, that any attempt to breach the security of the network,
                            our servers, databases or other hardware or software may constitute
                            a crime punishable by law. For the reasons mentioned above, we
                            cannot warrant that your personal information will be absolutely
                            secure. Any transmission of data at or through the Site, other
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, or otherwise via the Internet or wireless
                            network, is done at your own risk.
                        
In compliance with applicable federal and state laws, we shall
                            notify you and any applicable regulatory agencies in the event
                            that we learn of an information security breach with respect to
                            your personal information. You will be notified via e-mail in
                            the event of such a breach. Please be advised that notice may
                            be delayed in order to address the needs of law enforcement,
                            determine the scope of network damage, and to engage in remedial
                            measures.
                        


Minors

                            Visitors under eighteen (18) years of age are not permitted to
                            use and/or submit their personal information at the Site.
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ does not knowingly solicit or collect information
                            from visitors under eighteen (18) years of age. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            encourages parents and guardians to spend time online with their
                            children and to participate and monitor the interactive activities
                            of their children.
                        


Opt-Out/Unsubscribe

                            To opt-out of receiving e-mail communications from us, you can
                            follow the instructions at the end of the applicable e-mail message or e-mail us at:
                             support@globalfantasysports.com
                         
                        
Notwithstanding the foregoing, we may continue to contact you for
                            the purpose of communicating information relating to your request
                            for Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, your participation in the Contests, as
                            well as to respond to any inquiry or request made by you.
                            To opt-out of receiving Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings-related,
                            Contest-related and/or inquiry response-related messages from
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, you must cease requesting and/or utilizing the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, cease participating in the Contests
                            and/or cease submitting inquiries to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, as applicable.
                        


Deleting, Modifying and Updating Your Information

                            At your request, we will: (a) inform you of what personal information
                            we have on file for you; (b) amend the personal information that we
                            have on file for you; and/or (c) remove personal information that
                            you have provided to us, or that we have collected. You may do so by e-mailing us at:
                             support@globalfantasysports.com
                         .
                            We ask individual Users to identify themselves and the information
                            requested to be accessed, corrected or removed before processing
                            such requests, and, to the extent permitted by applicable law,
                            we may decline to process requests that are unreasonably repetitive
                            or systematic, require disproportionate technical effort,
                            jeopardize the privacy of others or would be extremely impractical
                            (for instance, requests concerning information residing on backup tapes).
                        

                            Please be advised that deleting your personal information may
                            terminate your access to certain of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings,
                            including potentially terminating your eligibility in any Contest(s)
                            that you have entered. If you wish to continue using the full complement
                            of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, you may not be able to delete all of the
                            personal information that we have on file for you.
                        

                            Please be further advised that, after you delete your personal
                            information, residual copies may take a period of time before they
                            are deleted from our active servers and may remain in our backup
                            systems.
                        


Changes to this Privacy Policy

                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to change or update this Privacy
                            Policy at any time by posting a notice on the Site that we are
                            changing our Privacy Policy. If the manner in which we use
                            personal information changes, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will notify Users
                            by: (a) sending the modified policy to our Users via email;
                            and/or (b) by any other reasonable means acceptable under
                            applicable state and federal law. You will have a choice
                            as to whether or not we use your information in this different
                            manner and we will only use your information in this different
                            manner where you opt-in to such use.
                        


Contact Us

                            If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy,
                            please e-mail us support@globalfantasysports.com



Filing a Complaint with the Federal Trade Commission

                            To file a complaint regarding our privacy practices, please
                             Click here 
                        












Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Website Terms and Conditions
The Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ website located at golf.globalfantasysports.com (the “Site”),
                            is operated by Global Fantasy Sports Inc. (“Global Fantasy Sports Golf™,” “we,” “our” or “us”).
                            You agree to the following Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Website Terms and Conditions
                            (“Terms and Conditions”), in their entirety, when you: (a) access or
                            use the Site; and/or (b) register as a user (“User”) of the Site,
                            which provides you with access to: (i) the Site’s viewable Content
                            (as defined below) and other material; (ii) interactive areas of
                            the Site (where and when available), such as blog and comment
                            sections, that enable Users to interact with other Users, as well
                            as Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ personnel (“Interactive Services”); and (iii)
                            an array of daily and weekly golf-themed fantasy sports-based games
                            (collectively, “Contests”) involving golfers associated with the
                            Professional Golfers Association of America (“PGA®”) or any other
                            professional golf organization designated by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ (each, an “Association”).
                            The Site, Content, Interactive Services and Contests are referred
                            to, collectively herein, as the “Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings.”
                        

                            These Terms and Conditions are inclusive of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Privacy Policy, the rules applicable to all Contests (“Contest Rules”),
                            the Competition Room Rules (as defined below) and any and all other
                            applicable Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ operating rules, policies, price schedules
                            and other supplemental terms and conditions or documents that may be
                            published from time to time, which are expressly incorporated herein
                            by reference (collectively, the “Agreement”). Please review the
                            Agreement carefully before accessing the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings.
                            The Agreement constitutes the entire and only agreement between you
                            and Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ with respect to your use of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Offerings and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements,
                            representations, warranties and/or understandings with respect
                            to your use of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and/or the products,
                            services and/or programs provided by and/or through same. Unless
                            explicitly stated otherwise, any future offer(s) made available
                            to you on the Site that augment(s) or otherwise enhance(s) the
                            current features of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings shall be subject
                            to the Agreement. If you do not agree to the terms and conditions
                            contained within the Agreement in its entirety, you are not
                            authorized to become a User and/or access or use the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Offerings in any manner or form whatsoever.


                            The Professional Golfers Association of America and PGA® are
                            registered trademarks of the Professional Golfers Association of America.
                            Please be advised that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not in any way affiliated with
                            the Professional Golfers Association of America or any other Association,
                            and neither Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ nor the Contests are endorsed or sponsored by
                            the Professional Golfers Association of America or any other Association.
                        


1. Requirements.

                            The Contests are available only to individuals that: (a) are legal
                            residents of, and that physically reside in, the United States
                            (with restrictions applying to residents of the States of Arizona,
                            Iowa, Louisiana, Montana, Nevada, North Dakota, New York, Tennessee, Vermont and Washington,
                            as well as Puerto Rico and where otherwise prohibited by law, collectively,
                            the “Restricted Territories”); (b) are at least: (i) eighteen (18) years
                            of age; or (ii) the age of majority in their respective jurisdictions
                            at the time of entry, if the age of majority is greater than eighteen
                            (18) years of age; (c) can enter into legally binding contracts under
                            applicable law; and (d) are not associated with a professional athlete
                            and/or Association (as defined below) that is/are involved in any Contest
                            in a way that creates, or could create, an unfair advantage in any
                            Contest including, without limitation, Association officials, referees,
                            owners and/or employees, as well as a professional athlete’s management,
                            agent(s), caddies and/or medical advisors. Residents of the States
                            of Arizona, Iowa, Louisiana, Montana, Nevada, North Dakota, New York, Tennessee, Vermont
                            and Washington, as well as Puerto Rico, and where otherwise prohibited by law, are not
                            eligble to enter Global Fantasy Sports Inc pay to play,
                            (as defined below and in the Contest Rules).
                        

                            WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, AND WITHOUT EXCEPTION, ALL PROSPECTIVE
                            USERS ARE SOLELY AND EXCLUSIVELY RESPONSIBLE FOR ENSURING THAT USE OF
                            A HOW FAR GOLF™ OFFERING IS NOT PROHIBITED BY ANY LAW APPLICABLE TO THAT
                            PROSPECTIVE USER’S RESIDENT JURISDICTION.
                        

                            In seeking to register a User account on the Site (“Account”),
                            you are representing to us that you are of sufficient age and not
                            legally resident, or physically located in, a Restricted Territory
                            and you agree to provide us, upon request, with such documentation
                            as we may require from time-to-time to verify your age, identity
                            and residency status. You acknowledge and agree that failure to
                            provide any such documentation within a timely fashion may result
                            in the suspension or termination of your Account, as well as
                            forfeiture of any applicable Prizes (as defined below) awarded
                            to you, without notice.
                        


2. Modification.

                            To the extent permissible by applicable law, we may amend the Agreement
                            from time to time in our sole discretion, without specific notice
                            to you; provided, however, that: (a) any amendment or modification
                            to the arbitration provisions, prohibition on class action provisions
                            or any other provisions applicable to dispute resolution
                            (collectively, “Dispute Resolution Provisions”) shall not apply
                            to any disputes incurred prior to the applicable amendment or
                            modification; and (b) any amendment or modification to pricing
                            and/or billing provisions (“Billing Provisions”) shall not apply
                            to any charges incurred prior to the applicable amendment or
                            modification. The latest Agreement will be posted on the Site,
                            and you should review the Agreement, in its entirety, prior to
                            using the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings. By your continued use of the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, you hereby agree to comply with, and be
                            bound by, all of the terms and conditions contained within the
                            Agreement effective at that time (other than with respect to
                            disputes arising prior to the amendment or modification of
                            the Dispute Resolution Provisions, or charges incurred prior to
                            the amendment or modification of the Billing Provisions, which
                            shall be governed by the Dispute Resolution Provisions and/or
                            Billing Provisions then in effect at the time of the subject
                            dispute or incurred charges, as applicable).
                        


3. Registration.

                            In order to obtain access to the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings including,
                            without limitation, the Contests as a User, you must first submit
                            the applicable registration form to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ for review and
                            approval (“Form”). Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right, in its sole
                            discretion, to deny access to the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings to
                            anyone at any time and for any reason, whatsoever.
                            The registration data that you must supply in order to become
                            a registered User, and then an Entrant (as defined in the Contest Rules)
                            in a Contest, may include, without limitation, your: (a) full name;
                            (b) state and country of residence; (c) e-mail address (including
                            the e-mail address associated with your PayPal® account, where
                            applicable); (d) password; (e) billing/mailing address
                            (where entering a Paid Contest, as defined below); (f) credit
                            card information (where selected as your preferred payment method);
                            (g) Social Security Number (for potential Prize winners);
                            (h) picture proof of identification, which may include a driver’s
                            license, passport, voting card or similar government issued
                            identification (for potential Prize winners); and/or (i) any other
                            information requested on the applicable Form (“Form Registration Data”).
                            In addition, Users may register for an Account by and through their
                            Facebook® accounts, Google+® accounts or any other means designated
                            by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™. Where you register via your Facebook® account,
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will have access to your: (i) Facebook® public profile;
                            (ii) the e-mail address associated with your Facebook® account; and
                            (iii) any and all other information made available to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            by and through your Facebook® account (“Facebook® Registration Data”).
                            Where you register via your Google+® account, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will
                            have access to your: (A) basic Google+® profile information; (B)
                            the e-mail address associated with your Google+® account; and (C)
                            any and all other information made available to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ by and
                            through your Google+® account (“Google+® Registration Data,” and together
                            with the Form Registration Data and Facebook® Registration Data,
                            the “Registration Data”).
                        

                            You agree to provide true, accurate, current and complete
                            Registration Data and to update your Registration Data as
                            necessary in order to maintain it in an up to date and accurate
                            fashion. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will verify and approve all registrants
                            in accordance with its standard verification procedures.
                            If Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ approves your Form, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will set up
                            your specific Account.
                            Only one (1) Account is permitted per person.


                            During registration, you will be asked to provide a user name
                            and password to use as your Account log-in identification,
                            where applicable (“Log-In”). If the Log-In that you request
                            is not available, you will be asked to supply another Log-In.
                            You can change the user name and/or password that you selected
                            during registration at any time through your Account settings.
                            You are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your
                            Account and Log-In, and for restricting access to your computer,
                            and you agree to accept responsibility for all activities that occur
                            through use of your Account and Log-In,
                            including any Entry Fees paid therethrough
                        

                            Facebook® is a registered trademark of Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”).
                            Google+® is a registered trademark of Google, Inc. (“Google”). PayPal®
                            is a registered trademark of PayPal, Inc. (“PayPal”). Please be advised
                            that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not in any way affiliated with Facebook, Google
                            or PayPal, nor are the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings or Contests endorsed,
                            administered or sponsored by Facebook, Google or PayPal.
                        


4. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings.

                            A User Account will enable you to utilize the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings
                            and other features including, but not limited to: (a) viewable Content;
                            (b) the Contests; and (c) Interactive Services.
                        
4.1 Contests

                            Capitalized terms used in this Section 4(i) but not defined in
                            these Terms and Conditions shall have the meaning set forth in the Contest Rules.
                        

                            Competition Room Rules: Periodically, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will make
                            Contests available to Users. Each Contest shall be subject to the
                            Contest Rules, and may include certain specific terms, conditions
                            and restrictions, as predetermined and set forth in the rules
                            appearing on the “Competition Room” page associated with each
                            applicable Contest (“Competition Room Rules,” and together with
                            the Contest Rules, the “Rules”), including, without limitation:
                            (A) the minimum/maximum number of Entrants who may participate;
                            (B) the applicable Entry Fee, Prize amount, and number of winners;
                            and (C) the applicable Contest type (5-Ball Contest, Pick-18 Contest,
                            Hole-in-1 Contest, etc.). In addition, Entrants may join Contests
                            with random opponents, or invite friends to compete one-on-one or in
                            larger groups. Users can invite friends on their own, or utilize
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ social media invitation functionality
                            that enables Users to invite friends via their Facebook® accounts,
                            Google+® accounts, Twitter® accounts or other designated social
                            media accounts and/or methods. The Entrants shall be accepted in
                            Contests for which they are eligible on a first-come, first-served basis.
                        

                            Twitter® is a registered trademark of Twitter, Inc. (“Twitter”).
                            Please be advised that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not in any way affiliated
                            with Twitter, nor are the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings or Contests endorsed,
                            administered or sponsored by Twitter.
                        

IT IS PROHIBITED FOR TWO (2) OR MORE ENTRANTS TO COLLABORATE
                                DURING ANY CONTEST OR TO ADOPT A STRATEGY (BEFORE OR DURING A
                                CONTEST) IN ORDER TO MUTUALLY GAIN AN ADVANTAGE AND/OR HARM OTHER
                                ENTRANTS (COLLECTIVELY, “COLLUSION”).
                            



                                TO THE EXTENT PERMISSIBLE BY APPLICABLE LAW, HOW FAR GOLF™
                                IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR ATTEMPTED CONTEST REGISTRATIONS
                                THAT ARE LOST, LATE, ILLEGIBLE, MISDIRECTED, DAMAGED,
                                INCOMPLETE OR INCORRECT, OR FOR YOUR FAILURE TO PARTICIPATE
                                IN, OR COMPLETE, A SCHEDULED CONTEST. IF YOU FAIL TO ENTER
                                A CONTEST INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, WHERE YOU CANNOT
                                ACCESS THE SITE FOR ANY REASON WHATSOEVER, YOU WILL NOT BE
                                ABLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THAT CONTEST.
                            


                            Entry Fees; Account Deposits: Subject to Section 1 above,
                            the Contests can either be played: (I) for a fee, with a chance
                            to win cash and/or merchandise (“Pay Contests”); and (II) for
                            free and/or for Virtual Tokens, with a chance to win cash,
                            merchandise and/or more Virtual Tokens (“Free Contests”). In
                            connection with Pay Contests, Users must pay the applicable
                            Entry Fee from their Account in advance of that Contest’s Start Time.
                            In connection with Free Contests that require Virtual Tokens
                            to play, Users must pay the applicable Virtual Token entry fee
                            from their Account in advance of that Contest’s Start Time.
                            The Entry Fee and/or Virtual Token entry fee associated with
                            each Contest will be predetermined and set forth in the applicable
                            Competition Room Rules. Contests that do not attract the requisite
                            number of Entrants will be cancelled prior to commencement, and any
                            and all Entry Fees and Virtual Tokens fully refunded.
                        

                            Where you opt to deposit funds into your Account, your PayPal® account,
                            or the credit or debit card that you provided during registration or
                            updated at a later date (“Active Credit Card”), will be charged the
                            applicable amount. All Entry Fees are payable in United States currency.
                            Subject to the conditions set forth herein, you agree to be bound by
                            the Billing Provisions of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ in effect at any given time.
                            Upon reasonable prior written notice to you (with e-mail sufficing),
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to change its Billing Provisions
                            whenever necessary, in its sole discretion. Continued use of the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings after receipt of such notice shall constitute
                            consent to any and all such changes; provided, however, that any
                            amendment or modification to the Billing Provisions shall not apply
                            to any charges incurred prior to the applicable amendment or modification.
                            All Entry Fee charges will appear on your Active Credit Card statement,
                            or PayPal® account statement, as applicable, as “Global Fantasy Sports.”
                        

                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ authorization to provide and bill for the Global Fantasy Sports
                            Golf™ Offerings is obtained by way of your electronic signature or,
                            where applicable, via physical signature and/or voice affirmation.
                            Once an electronic signature is submitted, this electronic order
                            constitutes an electronic letter of agency. Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ reliance
                            upon your electronic signature was specifically sanctioned and written
                            into law when the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act and the Electronic
                            Signatures in Global and National Transactions Act were
                            enacted in 1999 and 2000, respectively.
                            Both laws specifically preempt all state laws that recognize only paper
                            and handwritten signatures.
                        

                            Prizes; Withdrawals; and Taxes: The potential winner(s) of the
                            Pay Contests (subject to eligibility verification and/or other potential
                            disqualification, as set forth herein) will receive the applicable
                            monetary Prize. The potential winners of the Free Contests may
                            receive Virtual Token Prizes or, in some select circumstances, monetary Prizes.
                            Monetary Prize amounts may be withdrawn by a User at any time, and
                            will be paid to that User’s Active Credit Card, PayPal® account or
                            by check sent directly by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™; provided, however, that
                            certain bonus Prizes, registration bonuses and other free money
                            giveaways, as offered by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ from time-to-time, may be
                            subject to certain withdrawal restrictions. Checks for withdrawal
                            requests are processed within fourteen (14) business days, and are
                            sent via U.S. Mail
                            Please note that the Virtual Tokens have no monetary or other value
                                outside of entry into certain Free Contests, and the Virtual Tokens
                                cannot be exchanged for cash, products and/or merchandise.



                                You are responsible for paying any sales, use or other taxes
                                related to any Prizes awarded to you in connection with the
                                Contests. Without limiting the foregoing, any request for
                                withdrawal from your Account that brings your total earnings
                                (withdrawals less deposits) to an amount over Six Hundred
                                Dollars ($600.00) for any calendar year will require that
                                you provide us with a valid street address and Social Security
                                Number prior to processing. This information will be used by
                                us to file a form 1099-MISC at the end of the year. In addition,
                                Entrants may be requested to complete an affidavit of eligibility
                                and a liability/publicity release (unless prohibited by law) and
                                provide forms of identification including, but not limited to, a
                                driver's license, proof of residence and/or any information
                                relating to payment/deposit accounts as reasonably requested
                                by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ in order to complete the payment process.
                                Failure to comply with the above requirements may result in
                                disqualification and forfeiture of any Prizes.
                            



                                ALL DETERMINATIONS WITH RESPECT TO WINNERS AND PRIZES
                                WILL BE MADE IN HOW FAR GOLF’S™ SOLE AND ABSOLUTE DISCRETION,
                                AND WILL BE FINAL AND BINDING ON YOU.
                            



                                HOW FAR GOLF™ RESERVES THE RIGHT TO DISQUALIFY AND/OR INVALIDATE
                                ANY PRIZES AWARDED WHERE THE APPLICABLE PRIZE WINNER FAILED TO
                                COMPLY WITH THE AGREEMENT, IN ANY MANNER.
                            


                            Cancellation/Invalidation of Contests: Without limiting any
                            provision set forth in the Rules, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right
                            to terminate and/or invalidate the results of any and all Contests
                            (including associated Prizes) where Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ determines, in
                            its sole and absolute discretion, that such cancellation/invalidation:
                            (x) is necessary or advisable due to any change in or to any law,
                            regulation or legal interpretation thereof affecting the Contests
                            in any way; and/or (y) for purposes of preventing abusive, fraudulent,
                            unfair or potentially unlawful activity, or in the event that
                            there is a risk of any such abusive, fraudulent, unfair or
                            potentially unlawful activity.
                        


                                YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT HOW FAR GOLF™ IS NOT RESPONSIBLE
                                OR LIABLE IN ANY MANNER WHATSOEVER FOR ANY CONTEST CANCELLATION
                                OR FOR YOUR INABILITY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE CONTESTS
                                FOR ANY OTHER REASON, WHATSOEVER.
                            

4.2 Content

                            Users that possess the requisite technology shall have the
                            opportunity to view certain sports-related and other media
                            (downloaded, streaming or samples), leaderboards, statistics,
                            software, text, images, graphics, user interfaces, audio,
                            trademarks, logos, artwork, Feedback (as defined below) and other
                            content made available by and through the Site (collectively, “Content”)
                            as compiled, distributed and displayed by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, as well
                            as Users and third party statistics providers and/or other entities
                            (collectively, “Third Party Providers”) that provide sports-related
                            news and information by and through the Site via updated news feeds.
                            The Content will be organized by theme and genre to enable Users
                            to locate areas of interest. The Content should not necessarily
                            be relied upon. The Third Party Providers are solely responsible
                            for the accuracy, completeness, appropriateness and/or usefulness
                            of such Content. You may find certain Content to be harmful,
                            inaccurate and/or deceptive. Please use caution, common sense
                            and safety when using the Content.
                        


                                To the extent permissible by applicable law, you
                                understand and agree that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will not be responsible
                                for, and Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ undertakes no responsibility to monitor,
                                or otherwise police, the Content. To the extent permissible by
                                applicable law, you agree that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ shall have no
                                obligation and incur no liability to you in connection with any
                                Content.
                            

4.3 Interactive Services/Feedback.

                            Subject to the restrictions set forth herein, the Interactive
                            Services (where and when available) will allow Users to participate
                            in comment sections and other interactive areas of the Site.
                            Each User agrees to use the Interactive Services in full compliance
                            with all applicable laws, rules and regulations. Each User shall
                            be solely responsible for her/his comments, opinions, statements,
                            feedback and other content posted by and through the Interactive
                            Services (“Feedback”). You understand and agree that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            shall not be liable to you, any other User or any third party for
                            any claim in connection with your use of, or inability to use, the
                            Interactive Services. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ does not monitor the Feedback
                            submitted by Users, and operates the Interactive Services as a
                            neutral host. The Interactive Services contain Feedback that is
                            provided directly by Users. You agree that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ shall
                            have no obligation and incur no liability to you in connection with
                            any Feedback appearing in or through the Interactive Services.
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ does not represent or warrant that the Feedback
                            posted through the Interactive Services is accurate, complete
                            or appropriate. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to remove any
                            Feedback from the Site at any time and for any reason,
                            in Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ sole discretion.
                        

                            In connection with your Feedback, you agree not to: (A) display
                            any telephone numbers, street addresses, last names, URLs, e-mail
                            addresses or any confidential information of any third party; (B)
                            display any audio files, text, photographs, videos or other images
                            containing confidential information; (C) display any audio files,
                            text, photographs, videos or other images that may be deemed indecent
                            or obscene, as defined under applicable law; (D) impersonate any person
                            or entity; (E) “stalk” or otherwise harass any person; (F) engage in
                            advertising to, or commercial solicitation of, Users or other third
                            parties; (G) transmit any chain letters, spam or junk e-mail to any
                            Users or other third parties; (H) express or imply that any statements
                            that you make are endorsed by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™; (I) harvest or collect
                            personal information of Users or other third parties whether or not
                            for commercial purposes, without their express consent; (J) use any
                            robot, spider, site search/retrieval application, or other manual
                            or automatic device or process to retrieve, index, “data mine,” or
                            in any way reproduce or circumvent the navigational structure or
                            presentation of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings or related content; (K) post,
                            distribute or reproduce in any way any copyrighted material, trademarks
                            or other proprietary information without obtaining the prior consent
                            of the owner of such proprietary rights; (L) remove any copyright,
                            trademark or other proprietary rights notices contained within the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings; (M) interfere with or disrupt any of the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and/or the servers or networks connected
                            to same; (N) post, offer for download, e-mail or otherwise transmit
                            any material that contains software viruses or any other computer
                            code, files or programs designed to interrupt, destroy or limit
                            the functionality of any computer software or hardware or
                            telecommunications equipment; (O) post, offer for download,
                            transmit, promote or otherwise make available any software,
                            product or service that is illegal or that violates the rights
                            of a third party including, but not limited to, spyware,
                            adware, programs designed to send unsolicited advertisements
                            (i.e. “spamware”), services that send unsolicited advertisements,
                            programs designed to initiate “denial of service” attacks,
                            mail bomb programs and programs designed to gain unauthorized access
                            to networks on the Internet; (P) “frame” or “mirror” any part
                            of the Site; (Q) use metatags or code or other devices containing
                            any reference to the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings in order to direct
                            any person to any other website for any purpose; and/or (R) modify,
                            adapt, sublicense, translate, sell, reverse engineer, decipher,
                            decompile or otherwise disassemble any portion of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Offerings or any software used on or in connection with same.
                            Engaging in any of the aforementioned prohibited practices shall
                            be deemed a breach of the Agreement and may result in the immediate
                            termination of, or access to, some or all of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Offerings without notice, in the sole discretion of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™.
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to pursue any and all legal remedies
                                against Users that engage in the aforementioned prohibited conduct.




                            5. Cancellation of Account.
                        

                            You may cancel your Account at any time if you are not completely
                            satisfied. To cancel your Account, simply e-mail us at:
                              support@globalfantasysports.com ,
                            or cease using the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings.
                            In addition, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to cancel the Account
                            of any User for any reason or no reason, including where Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            believes that such User is in breach of the Agreement,
                            in Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ sole and absolute discretion. You understand
                            and agree that cancellation of your Account is your sole right
                            and remedy with respect to any dispute with Global Fantasy Sports Golf™. Upon
                            any termination and/or cancellation of your Account, your license
                            grant, as set forth in Section 6 hereinbelow shall immediately
                            terminate. You shall not receive any refund for Entry Fees previously
                            paid for, up to the date of cancellation or termination.
                        


6. License Grant.

                            As a User of the Site, you are granted a non-exclusive,
                            non-transferable, revocable and limited license to access and use
                            the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and all other material, products and/or
                            services posted or made available by and through same
                            (collectively, “Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material”) in accordance with the
                            Agreement. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may terminate this license at any
                            time for any reason. Unless otherwise expressly authorized by
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, you may only use the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material
                            for your own personal, non-commercial use. No part of the How
                            Far Golf™ Material may be reproduced in any form or incorporated
                            into any information retrieval system, electronic or mechanical.
                            You may not use, copy, emulate, clone, rent, lease, sell, modify,
                            decompile, disassemble, reverse engineer or transfer the Global Fantasy Sports
                            Golf™ Material and/or any portion thereof. You may not create any
                            “derivative works” by altering any aspect of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material.
                            You may not use Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material in conjunction with any other
                            third-party content (e.g., to provide sound for a film).
                            You may not exploit any aspect of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material
                            for any commercial purposes not expressly permitted by
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ (including the bundled sale of such
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material). Systematic retrieval of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Material by automated means or any other form of scraping or
                            data extraction in order to create or compile, directly or indirectly,
                            a collection, compilation, database or directory without written
                            permission from Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is strictly prohibited. You further
                            agree to indemnify and hold harmless Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ for your failure
                            to comply with this Section 6. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves any rights
                            not explicitly granted in the Agreement.
                        


7. Proprietary Rights.

                            All Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material is owned or licensed by or to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™,
                            and is protected under applicable copyrights, trademarks and other
                            proprietary (including, but not limited to, intellectual property)
                            rights. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, no part of
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material may be reproduced, recorded, retransmitted,
                            sold, rented, broadcast, distributed, published, uploaded, posted,
                            publicly displayed, altered to make new works, performed, digitized,
                            compiled, translated or transmitted in any way to any other computer,
                            website or other medium or for any commercial purpose, without
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ prior express written consent. Except as expressly
                            provided herein, you are not granted any rights or license to
                            patents, copyrights, trade secrets, rights of publicity or trademarks
                            with respect to any of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Material. The posting
                            of information or material at the Site by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ does not
                            constitute a waiver of any right in or to such information and/or
                            materials. Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves all rights not expressly
                            granted hereunder. The “Global Fantasy Sports Golf” name and logo are trademarks
                            of Global Fantasy Sports Golf, Inc. All custom graphics, icons and service
                            names are trademarks of their rightful owners. All other trademarks
                            are the property of their respective owners. The use of any
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ trademark without Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ express written
                            consent is strictly prohibited.
                        


8. Indemnification.

                            To the fullest extent permissible by applicable law, you agree
                            to indemnify and hold Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, its parents and subsidiaries,
                            and each of their respective members, officers, directors, employees,
                            agents, co-branders, content licensors and/or other partners,
                            harmless from and against any and all claims, expenses (including
                            reasonable attorneys’ fees), damages, suits, costs, demands
                            and/or judgments whatsoever, made by any third party due to or
                            arising out of: (a) your use of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings in
                            any way, whatsoever; (b) your breach of the Agreement; (c) any
                            dispute between you and any other Users, Third Party Providers
                            and/or other third parties; (d) any claim that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ owes
                            any taxes in connection with your use of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Offerings; and/or (e) your violation of any rights of another
                            individual and/or entity. The provisions of this Section 8 are
                            for the benefit of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, its parents, subsidiaries
                            and/or affiliates, and each of their respective officers,
                            directors, members, employees, agents, shareholders, licensors,
                            suppliers and/or attorneys. To the fullest extent permissible
                            by applicable law, each of these individuals and entities shall
                            have the right to assert and enforce these provisions directly
                            against you on its own behalf.
                        


9. Disclaimer of Warranties.

                            THE HOW FAR GOLF™ OFFERINGS, HOW FAR GOLF™ MATERIAL AND/OR ANY
                            OTHER PRODUCTS AND/OR SERVICES OFFERED IN CONNECTION WITH SAME,
                            ARE PROVIDED TO YOU ON AN “AS IS” AND “AS AVAILABLE” BASIS AND
                            ALL WARRANTIES, EXPRESS AND IMPLIED, ARE DISCLAIMED TO THE FULLEST
                            EXTENT PERMISSIBLE PURSUANT TO APPLICABLE LAW (INCLUDING, BUT NOT
                            LIMITED TO, THE DISCLAIMER OF ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
                            NON-INFRINGEMENT OF INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY AND/OR FITNESS FOR A
                            PARTICULAR PURPOSE). IN PARTICULAR, BUT NOT AS A LIMITATION
                            THEREOF, HOW FAR GOLF™ MAKES NO WARRANTY THAT THE HOW FAR GOLF™
                            OFFERINGS, HOW FAR GOLF™ MATERIAL AND/OR ANY OTHER PRODUCTS AND/OR
                            SERVICES OFFERED AND/OR ACCESSED IN CONNECTION WITH SAME: (A)
                            WILL MEET YOUR REQUIREMENTS; (B) WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED, TIMELY,
                            SECURE, ERROR-FREE OR THAT DEFECTS WILL BE CORRECTED; (C) WILL
                            BE FREE OF VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS; (D) WILL FEATURE
                            STATISTICS, CONTENT AND/OR LEADERBOARDS THAT ARE CURRENT, ACCURATE
                            OR RELIABLE; (E) WILL HAVE SECURITY METHODS EMPLOYED THAT WILL BE
                            SUFFICIENT AGAINST INTERFERENCE WITH YOUR ENJOYMENT OF SAME, OR
                            AGAINST INFRINGEMENT; (F) WILL RESULT IN ANY ECONOMIC BENEFIT OR
                            GAIN; AND/OR (G) WILL BE ACCURATE OR RELIABLE. THE HOW FAR GOLF™
                            OFFERINGS, HOW FAR GOLF™ MATERIAL AND/OR ANY OTHER PRODUCTS AND/OR
                            SERVICES OFFERED IN CONNECTION WITH SAME MAY CONTAIN BUGS, ERRORS,
                            PROBLEMS OR OTHER LIMITATIONS. HOW FAR GOLF™ WILL NOT BE LIABLE
                            FOR THE AVAILABILITY OF THE UNDERLYING INTERNET CONNECTION ASSOCIATED
                            WITH THE SITE. NO ADVICE OR INFORMATION, WHETHER ORAL OR WRITTEN,
                            OBTAINED BY YOU FROM HOW FAR GOLF™, ANY USERS, THIRD PARTY CONTENT
                            PROVIDERS OR OTHERWISE SHALL CREATE ANY WARRANTY NOT EXPRESSLY
                            STATED IN THE AGREEMENT.
                        


10. Limitation of Liability

                            YOU EXPRESSLY UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT HOW FAR GOLF™ SHALL
                            NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PARTY FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT,
                            INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL AND/OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES
                            INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS,
                            GOODWILL, USE, DATA OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF HOW FAR GOLF™
                            HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), TO THE
                            FULLEST EXTENT PERMISSIBLE BY LAW FOR: (A) THE USE OR THE INABILITY
                            TO USE THE HOW FAR GOLF™ OFFERINGS, HOW FAR GOLF™ MATERIAL AND/OR
                            ANY OTHER PRODUCTS AND/OR SERVICES OFFERED IN CONNECTION WITH SAME;
                            (B) THE COST OF PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS AND/OR SERVICES
                            RESULTING FROM ANY GOODS, DATA, INFORMATION, CONTENT AND/OR ANY
                            OTHER PRODUCTS PURCHASED OR OBTAINED FROM OR THROUGH THE SITE; (C)
                            THE UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO, OR ALTERATION OF, YOUR REGISTRATION
                            DATA; (D) ANY ISSUE RELATED TO THE TIMELINESS, ACCURACY OR RELIABILITY
                            OF STATISTICS, CONTENT AND/OR LEADERBOARDS THAT ARE MADE AVAILABLE
                            IN CONNECTION WITH THE HOW FAR GOLF™ OFFERINGS; (E) YOUR FAILURE TO
                            REALIZE ANY ECONOMIC BENEFIT OR GAIN; (F) THE CANCELLATION OF ANY
                            CONTEST(S) AND/OR PRIZES, AS PERMITTED HEREUNDER OR UNDER THE RULES;
                            AND (G) ANY OTHER MATTER RELATING TO THE HOW FAR GOLF™ OFFERINGS,
                            HOW FAR GOLF™ MATERIAL AND/OR ANY OTHER PRODUCTS AND/OR SERVICES
                            OFFERED AND/OR ACCESSED IN CONNECTION WITH SAME. TO THE FULLEST
                            EXTENT PERMISSIBLE BY LAW, THIS LIMITATION APPLIES TO ALL CAUSES
                            OF ACTION, IN THE AGGREGATE INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, BREACH
                            OF CONTRACT, BREACH OF WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY,
                            MISREPRESENTATIONS AND ANY AND ALL OTHER TORTS. TO THE FULLEST
                            EXTENT PERMISSIBLE BY LAW, YOU HEREBY RELEASE HOW FAR GOLF™ FROM
                            ANY AND ALL OBLIGATIONS, LIABILITIES AND CLAIMS IN EXCESS OF THE
                            LIMITATIONS STATED HEREIN. THE NEGATION OF DAMAGES SET FORTH
                            ABOVE IS A FUNDAMENTAL ELEMENT OF THE BASIS OF THE BARGAIN BETWEEN
                            YOU AND HOW FAR GOLF™. ACCESS TO THE HOW FAR GOLF™ OFFERINGS,
                            HOW FAR GOLF™ MATERIAL AND/OR ANY OTHER PRODUCTS AND/OR SERVICES
                            OFFERED IN CONNECTION WITH SAME WOULD NOT BE PROVIDED TO YOU
                            WITHOUT SUCH LIMITATIONS. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW CERTAIN
                            LIMITATIONS ON LIABILITY AND, IN SUCH JURISDICTIONS, HOW FAR GOLF’S™
                            LIABILITY SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW.
                        


11. Copyright Policy/DMCA Compliance.

                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to terminate the Account of any
                            User who infringes upon third-party copyrights. If you believe
                            that a copyrighted work has been copied and posted via the Site
                            in a way that constitutes copyright infringement, you should
                            provide Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ with the following information: (a) an
                            electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to
                            act on behalf of the owner of the copyrighted work; (b) an
                            identification and location within the Site of the copyrighted
                            work that you claim has been infringed; (c) a written statement
                            by you that you have a good faith belief that the disputed use
                            is not authorized by the owner, its agent or the law; (d) your
                            name and contact information, such as telephone number or e-mail
                            address; and (e) a statement by you that the above information
                            in your notice is accurate and, under penalty of perjury, that
                            you are the copyright owner or authorized to act on the copyright
                            owner’s behalf. Contact information for Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ Copyright
                            Agent for notice of claims of copyright infringement is as follows:
                        

                            Klein Moynihan Turco LLP 
                            Attn: Jonathan Turco, Esq. 
                            450 Seventh Avenue, 40th Floor 
                            New York, NY 10123 
                            jturco@kleinmoynihan.com 



12. Legal Warning.

                            If you bypass or disable any portion of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings
                            or associated software including, without limitation, the operation
                            of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ systems, or you attempt to circumvent or tamper
                            with the Contests or billing methods in any way, you are in
                            violation of the Agreement and Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may suspend or
                            terminate your Account without notice. Termination of your
                            Account will not excuse you from any criminal or other civil
                            liabilities that may result from your actions.
                        


13. Accessing the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings

                            You are responsible for obtaining and maintaining, at your own cost
                            and expense, all input/output devices or equipment (such as modems,
                            terminal equipment, computer equipment and software) and communications
                            services (including, without limitation, long distance or local telephone
                            services) necessary to access the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and for ensuring
                            that such equipment and services are compatible with Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™
                            requirements.
                        


14. Third-Party Websites.

                            The Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings may provide links to other
                            Internet websites and/or resources including, without
                            limitation, websites owned and/or operated by Third Party
                            Providers. Because Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ has no control over such third
                            party websites and/or resources, you hereby acknowledge and agree
                            that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not responsible for the availability or
                            content of such third party websites and/or associated resources.
                            Furthermore, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ does not endorse, and is not responsible or
                            liable for, any terms and conditions, privacy policies, content,
                            advertising, services, products and/or other materials available
                            at or from such third party websites or resources, or for any
                            damages and/or losses arising therefrom or associated therewith.
                        


15. User Information.

                            All Feedback, comments, information, Registration Data and/or materials
                            that you submit through or in association with the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Offerings shall be subject to the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Privacy Policy.
                            For a copy of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Privacy Policy, please
                             Click here .
                        


16. Dispute Resolution Provisions.

                            The Agreement shall be treated as though it were executed and performed
                            in New York, NY and shall be governed by and construed in accordance
                            with the laws of the State of New York (without regard to conflict
                            of law principles). Should a dispute arise concerning the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings,
                            the terms and conditions of the Agreement or the breach of
                            same by any party hereto: (a) the parties agree to submit
                            their dispute for resolution before a reputable arbitration
                            organization as mutually agreed upon by the parties; and (b) you
                            agree to first commence a formal dispute proceeding by completing
                            and submitting an
                            Initial Dispute Notice which can be found
                             Here .
                            We may choose to provide you with a final written settlement offer
                            after receiving your Initial Dispute Notice (“Final Settlement Offer”).
                            If we provide you with a Final Settlement Offer and you do not accept
                            it, or we cannot otherwise satisfactorily resolve your dispute,
                            you can submit your dispute for resolution by arbitration before
                            a reputable arbitration organization as mutually agreed upon by
                            the parties, in your county of residence, by filing a separate
                            Demand for Arbitration, which is available
                             Here .
                            Any award rendered shall be final and conclusive to the parties
                            and a judgment thereon may be entered in any court of competent
                            jurisdiction. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to
                            preclude any party from: (i) seeking injunctive relief in order
                            to protect its rights pending an outcome in arbitration; and/or
                            (ii) pursuing the matter in small claims court rather than arbitration.
                            Although we may have a right to an award of attorneys’ fees and
                            expenses if we prevail in arbitration, we will not seek such an
                            award from you unless the arbitrator determines that your claim
                            was frivolous.



                                To the extent permitted by law, you agree that you will
                                not bring, join or participate in any class action lawsuit
                                as to any claim, dispute or controversy that you may have
                                against Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ and/or its employees, officers, directors,
                                representatives and/or assigns. You agree to the entry of
                                injunctive relief to stop such a lawsuit or to remove you as
                                a participant in the suit. You agree to pay the attorney’s
                                fees and court costs that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ incurs in seeking
                                such relief. This provision preventing you from bringing,
                                joining or participating in class action lawsuits: (A) does
                                not constitute a waiver of any of your rights or remedies
                                to pursue a claim individually in binding arbitration as
                                provided above; and (B) is an independent agreement.
                                You may opt-out of these dispute resolution provisions
                                by providing written notice of your decision within thirty
                                (30) days of the date that you first access the Site.
                            



17. Miscellaneous.

                            Should any part of the Agreement be held invalid or unenforceable,
                            that portion shall be construed consistent with applicable law and
                            the remaining portions shall remain in full force and effect.
                            The Agreement is personal between you and Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ and it
                            governs your use of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Material. To the extent that anything in or associated with the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings is in conflict or inconsistent with these
                            Terms and Conditions, these Terms and Conditions shall take precedence;
                            provided, however, that with respect to any Contests, to the extent
                            that anything in these Terms and Conditions is inconsistent with the
                            applicable Rules, those Rules shall take precedence. Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™
                            failure to enforce any provision of the Agreement shall not be deemed
                            a waiver of such provision nor of the right to enforce such provision.
                            The parties do not intend that any agency or partnership relationship be
                            created through operation of the Agreement.
                        


18. Contact Us

                            If you have any questions about the Agreement or the practices
                            of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, please feel free to e-mail us at:
                             support@globalfantasysports.com.
                        












Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Contest Rules

                            The Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ contests (collectively, the “Contests”), made available by and
                            through the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ website located at  golf.globalfantasysports.com
                         (the “Site”),
                            are operated by Global Fantasy Sports, Inc. (“Global Fantasy Sports Golf™,” “we,” “our” or “us”).
                            These Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Contest Rules (the “Contest Rules”), as well as the terms, conditions
                            and Contest features that apply to each Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Contest individually as made available
                            on the registration page applicable to each Contest (the “Competition Room Rules” and together
                            with these Contest Rules, the “Rules”), shall govern your ability to earn Prizes (as defined below)
                            in connection with your participation in the Contests as a contestant (“Entrant”). Capitalized
                            terms that are used but not defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            Terms and Conditions (“Terms”).
                        


Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreements
In addition to the Rules, the Contests, and each Entrant’s participation
                            in the Contests, shall be governed by all applicable Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ agreements including,
                            without limitation, the Terms and the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Privacy Policy made available on
                            the Site (collectively, “Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreements”). The Rules are hereby incorporated
                            into the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreements, and any and all terms and conditions contained therein
                            shall apply to the Rules. Where there is a conflict between the terms and conditions of
                            the Rules and those of the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreements, to the extent that they apply to a
                            Contest, the Rules shall govern in all respects.
                        
Please review the Rules, and all applicable Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreements, carefully, prior
                            to participating in a Contest. If you do not agree to all of the terms contained
                            in the Rules, and all applicable Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreements, in their respective
                            entirety, you are not authorized to become an Entrant in any Contest.
                        


Eligibility/Necessary Equipment
The Contests are available only to individuals that: (a) are legal
                            residents of, and that physically reside in, the United States (with restrictions
                            applying to residents of the States of Arizona, Iowa, Louisiana, Montana, Nevada,
                                North Dakota, New York, Tennessee, Vermont and Washington, as well as Puerto Rico
                                and where otherwise prohibited by law); (b) are at least: (i) eighteen (18)
                            years of age; or (ii) the age of majority in their respective jurisdictions
                            at the time of entry, if the age of majority is greater than eighteen (18)
                            years of age; (c) can enter into legally binding contracts under applicable
                            law; and (d) are not associated with a professional athlete and/or Association
                            (as defined below) that is/are involved in any Contest in a way that creates,
                            or could create, an unfair advantage in any Contest including, without
                            limitation, Association officials, referees, owners and/or employees, as
                            well as a professional athlete’s management, agent(s), caddies and/or medical
                            advisors. Residents of the States of Arizona, Iowa, Louisiana, Montana, Nevada, North Dakota,
                                New York, Tennessee, Vermont and Washington, as well as Puerto Rico, and where otherwise
                                restricted by law, may only participate in the Free Contests (as defined below).
                        
In order to become an Entrant in a Contest, you must either be a registered User,
                            or submit a registration form by and through the Site in order to apply to become a User.
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to deny access to the Contests
                            to anyone at any time and for any reason, whatsoever. The registration data that you must
                            supply in order to become a registered User, and then an Entrant in a Contest, may include,
                            without limitation, your: (a) full name; (b) state and country of residence; (c) e-mail
                            address (including the e-mail address associated with your PayPal® account, where applicable);
                            (d) password; (e) billing/mailing address (where entering a Paid Contest, as defined below);
                            (f) credit card information (where selected as your preferred payment method); (g) Social
                            Security Number (for potential Prize winners); (h) picture proof of identification, which
                            may include a driver’s license, passport, voting card or similar government issued
                            identification (for potential Prize winners); and/or (i) any other information requested
                            on the applicable Form. In addition, Users may register for an Account by and through
                            their Facebook® accounts, Google+® account or any other means designated by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™.
                            Where you register via your Facebook® account, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will have access to your: (i)
                            Facebook® public profile; (ii) the e-mail address associated with your Facebook® account;
                            and (iii) any and all other information made available to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ by and through your
                            Facebook® account. Where you register via your Google+® account, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will have
                            access to your: (A) basic Google+® profile information; (B) the e-mail address associated
                            with your Google+® account; and (C) any and all other information made available to
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ by and through your Google+® account.
                        
Only one (1) Account, and one (1) entry in each Contest, is allowed per person.
                            You shall be responsible, at all times, for ensuring that you have an Internet
                            connection, computer/mobile device and/or other equipment necessary to access the Contests.
                        
HOW FAR GOLF™ IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR ATTEMPTED CONTEST REGISTRATIONS
                            THAT ARE LOST, LATE, ILLEGIBLE, MISDIRECTED, DAMAGED, INCOMPLETE OR INCORRECT, OR FOR
                            YOUR FAILURE TO PARTICIPATE IN, OR COMPLETE, A CONTEST. IF YOU FAIL TO ENTER
                            A CONTEST INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, WHERE YOU CANNOT ACCESS THE SITE FOR
                            ANY REASON WHATSOEVER, YOU WILL NOT BE ABLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THAT PARTICULAR CONTEST.
Facebook® is a registered trademark of Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”).
                            Google+® is a registered trademark of Google, Inc. (“Google”).
                            Please be advised that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not in any way affiliated
                            with either Facebook or Google, nor are the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings or
                            Contests endorsed, administered or sponsored by either Facebook or Google.
                        


Contests
General:
Each Contest may contain certain terms, conditions and restrictions,
                            including the minimum/maximum number of Entrants who may participate, the
                            types of Prizes (Virtual Tokens, as defined below, or monetary prizes), number
                            of Prize winners and the applicable scoring system associated with each
                            Contest, as set forth in the applicable Competition Room Rules.
                            In addition, Entrants may join Contests with random opponents,
                            or invite friends to compete one-on-one or in larger groups. Users
                            can invite friends on their own, or utilize Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ social media
                            invitation functionality that enables Users to invite friends via their
                            Facebook® accounts, Google+® accounts, Twitter® accounts or other designated
                            social media accounts and/or methods. The Entrants shall be accepted in
                            Contests for which they are eligible on a first-come, first-served basis.
                        
Twitter® is a registered trademark of Twitter, Inc. (“Twitter”).
                            Please be advised that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not in any way affiliated with Twitter,
                            nor are the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings or Contests endorsed,
                            administered or sponsored by Twitter.
All Contests shall be posted on the Site as they
                            become available for participation. Posting times may vary
                            depending on the time and day of the first tee time associated
                            with each Round (as defined below) applicable to the Contest
Each Contest will involve a set number of individual golfers
                            (each, a “Golfer”), as set forth in the Competition Room Rules, to be selected by the Entrant.
                            In connection with each Contest, Entrants must choose, at a minimum, three (3) Golfers to
                            join their team (“Team”), and at least two (2) different Rounds in which their Team will compete,
                            in a given tournament (“Tournament”) sponsored by or associated with the Professional
                            Golfers Association of America (“PGA®”) or any other professional golf organization
                            designated by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ (each, an “Association”). Depending on the Competition
                            Room Rules, Entrants may be able to change their selected Golfers up until the applicable
                            Contest’s start time (“Start Time”). The exact roster size of Golfers for each Team
                            in any given Contest will be predetermined and set forth in the applicable Competition
                            Room Rules. If you have not selected the requisite number of Golfers as of the
                            applicable Start Time, you will not be entered into that Contest.
                        
IT IS PROHIBITED FOR TWO (2) OR MORE ENTRANTS TO COLLABORATE
                            DURING A CONTEST OR TO ADOPT A STRATEGY (BEFORE OR DURING A CONTEST)
                            IN ORDER TO GAIN AN ADVANTAGE OVER, AND/OR TO DISADVANTAGE,
                            OTHER ENTRANTS.

The Professional Golfers Association of America and PGA®
                            are registered trademarks of the Professional Golfers Association of America.
                            Please be advised that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ is not in any way affiliated with the
                            Professional Golfers Association of America or any other Association, and
                            neither Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ nor the Contests are endorsed or sponsored by the Professional
                            Golfers Association of America or any other Association.
                        
Entry Fees/Free Contests:


In order to enter a paid Contest (“Paid Contest”), you must have
                                enough money in your Account to pay the entry fee required to enter the applicable
                                Contest (“Entry Fee”). You can enter as many Paid Contests as you want, provided
                                that you have sufficient funds in your Account for the applicable Entry Fees.
                                The Entry Fee for each Contest shall be set forth in the Competition Room Rules.
                                Each Entrant’s Account will be debited the applicable Entry Fee when he/she
                                completes his/her Golfer selections. You can deposit money into your Account via
                                either PayPal® or a credit/debit card. Charges will appear on your PayPal®
                                statement or credit/debit card statement, as applicable, through the identifier
                                “Global Fantasy Sports.” OTHER THAN AS EXPRESSLY SET FORTH HEREIN, ALL ENTRY FEES ARE NON-REFUNDABLE.

The Entry Fees are quoted in U.S. Dollars and are payable in U.S. Dollars.
                                Subject to the conditions set forth herein, you agree to be bound by the Billing Provisions
                                of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ in effect at any given time. Upon reasonable prior written notice to you
                                (with e-mail sufficing), Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves the right to change its Billing Provisions
                                whenever necessary, in its sole discretion. Continued participation in the Contests after
                                receipt of such notice shall constitute consent to any and all such changes; provided,
                                however, that any amendment or modification to the Billing Provisions shall not
                                apply to any charges incurred prior to the applicable amendment or modification.
                            
Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ authorization to bill for Account deposits and Entry
                                Fees is obtained by way of your electronic signature. Once an electronic signature is submitted,
                                the electronic order constitutes an electronic letter of agency. Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ reliance
                                upon your electronic signature was specifically sanctioned and written into law when the
                                Uniform Electronic Transactions Act and the Electronic Signatures in Global and National
                                Transactions Act were enacted in 1999 and 2000, respectively. Both laws specifically
                                preempt all state laws that recognize only paper and handwritten signatures.
                            
Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may offer free Contests from time-to-time which do
                                not require any Entry Fee to enter and which may, or may not, offer an associated
                                monetary Prize and/or Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ virtual tokens (“Virtual Tokens”) to the
                                applicable winner(s) (“Free Contests”). You can enter as many Free Contests
                                as you want; provided, however, that some Free Contests may require Virtual
                                Tokens to enter and, therefore, your ability to enter certain Free Contests
                                may be limited by the number of Virtual Tokens in your Account. Please
                                    note that the Virtual Tokens have no monetary or other value outside
                                    of entry into certain Free Contests, and the Virtual Tokens cannot be
                                    exchanged for cash, products and/or merchandise.


Contest Start Time/Contest Duration/Withdrawal/Points:

Contests may vary in duration from start to finish and may last for two
                            (2) rounds in a Tournament (each, a “Round”), one (1) entire Tournament or
                            such other interval, as determined by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ in its sole discretion (“Contest Duration”).
                        
Each Contest’s start time (“Start Time”) shall be set forth in the applicable Competition Room Rules, and shall generally correspond to when the first official tee time in the applicable Tournament for that Contest is scheduled to commence.
Contests are designed to close, and Teams are designed to lock, at the scheduled Start Time of the Contest.
You may leave a Contest at any point up until the scheduled Start Time. If you leave a Contest prior to the scheduled Start Time, the Entry Fee, if any, will be credited back to your Account.
Contests that do not get filled with the required minimum number of Entrants prior to the scheduled Start Time will be cancelled and Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will credit Entry Fees back to the Accounts of the Entrants that had already joined the Contests. Contests that are filled with the required minimum number of Entrants prior to the scheduled Start Time will be conducted.



Contest Types
5-Ball Contest
The following terms apply to “5-Ball Contests”:


Each Entrant must select two (2) Rounds of the applicable Tournament for which the Golfers on her/his Team will earn Points (as defined below). Golfers on an Entrant’s Team will not earn Points for Rounds of a Tournament that were not selected by that Entrant.
All Golfers in the applicable Tournament will be separated into tiers consisting of ten (10) Golfers, depending on their relative world rankings (Tier 1, Tier 2, Tier 3, etc.).
Depending on the number of Golfers required for each Team in the applicable 5-Ball Contest, each Entrant may only select one (1) Golfer from Tier 1, one (1) Golfer from Tier 2, one (1) Golfer from Tier 3, etc.; provided, however, that where an Entrant does not select a Golfer from a higher Tier, that Entrant may select one additional Golfer from a lower Tier. For example, if an Entrant does not select a Golfer from Tier 1, that Entrant may select two (2) Golfers from Tier 2, or a second Golfer from any other lower Tier.
Multiple Entrants are permitted to select the same Golfer on their respective Teams.
Each Golfer on an Entrant’s Team will earn Points based on the “Modified Stableford System” which awards Points for each Golfer’s result on each hole in an active Round of a given Contest according to the following chart:


                            Double Eagle: 8 Points
                            Eagle: 5 Points
                            Birdie: 2 Points
                            Par: 0 Points
                            Bogey: -1 Points
                            Double Bogey or Worse: -3 Points



Pick-18 Contest
The following terms apply to “Pick-18 Contests”:


Each Entrant must select two (2) Rounds of the applicable Tournament for which the Golfers on her/his Team will earn Points (as defined below). Golfers on an Entrant’s Team will not earn Points for Rounds of a Tournament that were not selected by that Entrant.
Depending on the number of Golfers required for each Team in the applicable Pick-18 Contest, each Entrant may select the requisite number from the entire list of Golfers competing in the applicable Tournament, without restriction by Tier or otherwise.
Multiple Entrants are permitted to select the same Golfer on their respective Teams.
Each Golfer on an Entrant’s Team will earn Points based on the predictions of the Entrant with respect to each such Golfer’s performance on each hole in an active Round of a given Contest. For each hole in a given Contest, the Entrant must predict how each Golfer on her/his Team will perform in relation to par for that hole, either: “Under,” “On” or “Over.” For each correct prediction, the Entrant will earn one (1) Point. For each incorrect prediction, the Entrant will receive zero Points.
In order to assist the prediction process, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may make available certain statistics regarding each Golfer’s recorded performance in previous tournaments (including hole-by-hole statistics), the length of each hole in the applicable Tournament, each Golfer’s world ranking, and the par stroke for each hole in the applicable Tournament.



Hole-in-1
The following terms apply to “Hole-in-1 Contests”:


Each Entrant must select two (2) Rounds of the applicable Tournament for which the Golfers on her/his Team will earn Points (as defined below). Golfers on an Entrant’s Team will not earn Points for Rounds of a Tournament that were not selected by that Entrant.
Depending on the number of Golfers required for each Team in the applicable Hole-in-1 Contest, each Entrant may select the requisite number from the entire list of Golfers competing in the applicable Tournament, without restriction by Tier or otherwise.
Multiple Entrants are permitted to select the same Golfer on their respective Teams.
Each Golfer in a Contest shall be assigned “Handicap” bonus strokes (“Bonus Strokes”) based on a proprietary method of calculation developed Global Fantasy Sports Golf™. The calculation is based on the world rank of each Golfer. Each Golfer’s Handicap will be set forth in the applicable Competition Room Rules prior to the Contest’s Start Time.
Each Bonus Stroke will lower a Golfer’s score on a given hole by one (1) stroke. Each Entrant must select, in advance, which holes in an active Round of a given Contest that it will apply its Bonus Strokes to. There is a limit of one (1) Bonus Stroke per hole.
Each Golfer on an Entrant’s Team will earn Points based on the Modified Stableford System which awards Points for each Golfer’s result on each hole (including where Bonus Strokes are applied) in an active Round of a given Contest according to the following chart:


                            Double Eagle: 8 Points
                            Eagle: 5 Points
                            Birdie: 2 Points
                            Par: 0 Points
                            Bogey: -1 Points
                            Double Bogey or Worse: -3 Points

Tallying Points/Statistics:
Each Entrant will earn Contest points based on the performance,
                            during the active Rounds of the applicable Contest, of the Golfers that
                            were on his/her Team (“Points”). Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will be responsible for
                            tallying the Points for each Contest based on the reporting of Golfer
                            performance provided by the applicable Association during the applicable
                            Contest Duration. Please be advised that during the Contests, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™
                            receives live scoring from its third-party statistics providers. Live scoring
                            statistics that appear during a Contest are subject to change by the applicable
                            Association after the conclusion of the applicable Round and/or Tournament.
                            Please be advised that, even in the event of a change to the statistics
                            by the applicable Association after the conclusion of the applicable Round
                            and/or Tournament, the applicable Golfer’s Points on the Site will not be
                            updated and the Contest outcomes will not be revised. Please note that where
                            a correction needs to be made after the conclusion of a given Round
                            and/or Tournament, as applicable, due to a problem with the statistics feed,
                            the Contest outcome (including payment of Prizes) may be reversed and
                            Contests resettled correctly.  ALL DETERMINATIONS WITH RESPECT
                                TO POINTS, PROJECTED POINTS, WINNERS AND PRIZES WILL BE MADE IN HOW FAR GOLF’S™
                                SOLE AND ABSOLUTE DISCRETION, AND WILL BE FINAL AND BINDING ON ALL PARTIES INVOLVED.

Single Winner Contests:
Where the Competition Room Rules indicate that the Contest
                            will have a single potential winner (subject to eligibility verification and/or
                            other potential disqualification, as set forth herein), the Entrant with the
                            most Points at the end of the Contest Duration will be deemed the potential
                            winner of that Contest. The winner of the Contest will receive the Virtual
                            Tokens and/or cash prize specified in the applicable Competition Room Rules
                            (the “Prize”). If two (2) or more Entrants finish in a tie with the top
                            Point total at the end of the Contest Duration, the Prize amount shall
                            be divided equally amongst all winners.
                        
Contests with Multiple Winners: 
Where the Competition Room Rules indicate that the Contest will have
                            multiple potential winners, the designated number of Entrants with the most Points
                            at the end of the Contest Duration will be deemed the potential winners of that
                            Contest, and the Prize totals shall be assigned to each potential winner depending
                            on what place she/he finished. In the event that two (2) or more Entrants finish
                            in a tie for any of the winning Point totals at the end of the Contest Duration,
                            the Prize amounts shall be divided equally amongst all potential winners with
                            the same Point total as if each were a potential winner of that tier’s Prize,
                            as well as the Prize(s) for the next tier or tiers. For example, if 1st, 2nd
                            and 3rd place in a given Contest includes Prizes of $500, $300 and $100, respectively,
                            and two (2) Entrants tie for first place, then those two (2) Entrants shall receive
                            $400 each ($500 + $300 divided by 2), and the Entrant that finished in 3rd place shall
                            receive $100.
                        
Withdrawals/Taxes:


Subject to the requirements set forth herein, the Prizes will be credited
                                to the winners’ Accounts. Monetary Prize winnings may be withdrawn from your Account,
                                at your option, and will be paid via the same method that the Entrant used to deposit
                                money to her/his Account; provided, however, that certain bonus Prizes, registration
                                bonuses and other free money giveaways, as offered by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ from time-to-time,
                                may be subject to certain withdrawal restrictions.
                            
All taxes associated with winning a Contest and/or receipt
                                of a Prize are the sole responsibility of the applicable winner/Prize recipient.
                                Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may contact you to obtain your Social Security Number or other
                                personal information for tax purposes. Without limiting the foregoing, any request
                                for withdrawal from your Account that brings your total earnings (withdrawals less deposits)
                                to an amount over Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) for any calendar year will require that
                                you provide us with a valid street address and Social Security Number prior to processing.
                                This information will be used by us to file a form 1099-MISC at the end of the year.
                            






Multiple Accounts
Each Entrant is allowed one (1) Account. Penalties for utilizing more than one (1)
                            Account without prior authorization from Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ will be assessed in
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf’s™ sole discretion, and may include closure of all applicable
                            Accounts and forfeiture of any Prizes that we determine to have been
                            fraudulently obtained. 


Suspended/Terminated Accounts
There are a variety of behaviors that may be deemed by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ to be detrimental
                            to Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings and other Entrants utilizing the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings including,
                            without limitation, where Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ determines that you have abused, misused or
                            violated the terms of the Rules, the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreements or any aspect of the Contests.
                            Engaging in those behaviors may result in suspension and/or termination of some or all
                            functions associated with your Account, as well as forfeiture of any Prizes previously won,
                            as determined by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ in its sole discretion. Suspended players are expected
                            to respect the disciplinary actions imposed by Global Fantasy Sports Golf™. 


User Names
Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may require Users to change their user names in cases
                            where the subject user name is offensive or promotes a commercial venture.
                            Any determination that a user name must be changed shall be made in How
                            Far Golf’s™ sole discretion, and if requests are ignored, Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may
                            unilaterally change a User’s user name.


Postponed Tournaments
If a Tournament is canceled prior to the Tournament’s commencement,
                            the associated Contest will be terminated, and all Entrants
                            will be refunded their Entry Fees. 


Suspended Rounds/Tournaments
A Round will be considered suspended if it is unfinished,
                            due to weather, time considerations or other intervening factor,
                            but is scheduled to be completed in the future. If a Round is suspended
                            for any reason, the Golfer statistics compiled for that Round will count toward
                            the applicable Contests, but only where the Round is officially completed prior
                            to 7:00pm Current Local Time (UTC), the following day. 


Indemnification
You agree to indemnify and hold Global Fantasy Sports Golf™, its parents and
                            subsidiaries, and each of their respective members, officers, directors,
                            shareholders, employees, agents, co-branders, content licensors and/or
                            other partners, harmless from and against any and all claims, expenses
                            (including reasonable attorneys’ fees), damages, suits, costs, demands and/or
                            judgments whatsoever, made by any third party related to or arising out of: (a)
                            your participation in a Contest in any way, whatsoever; (b) your breach of these
                            Contest Rules or any other Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Agreement; (c) any dispute between you
                            and any other Entrants, Associations, Users and/or third parties; (d) any claim
                            that Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ owes any taxes in connection with your participation in a
                            Contest; and/or (e) your violation of any rights of another individual and/or
                            entity. The provisions of this paragraph are for the benefit of Global Fantasy Sports Golf™,
                            its parents and subsidiaries, and each of their respective members, officers,
                            directors, shareholders, employees, agents, co-branders, content licensors
                            and/or other partners. Each of these individuals and entities shall have the
                            right to assert and enforce these provisions directly against you on its own behalf.


Access to the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings
While we try to ensure that the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings are
                            functioning smoothly at all times, like any online service, we may periodically
                            experience periods of outage or slow performance. These can sometimes result in,
                            among other things, an inability to access the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, problems
                            editing Teams and/or problems entering new Contests. If you are unable to access the
                            Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings, please report the problem by emailing us at:  support@globalfantasysports.com.
                            If there are sustained periods where Users are unable to access the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings,
                            or are otherwise prevented from editing Teams, we may provide instructions on how to cancel
                            any affected Contest entries.


Contest Cancellation
Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ reserves that right to cancel any Contests in our sole discretion,
                            for any reason and without restriction. These reasons may include, without limitation:
                            (a) where Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ believes that, due to problems with the Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ Offerings
                            or due to events affecting the actual Tournaments, there would be a negative impact on the
                            integrity of the applicable Contest(s); and/or (b) where Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ determines, in its
                            sole and absolute discretion, that such cancellation is necessary or advisable due to any
                            change in or to any law, regulation or legal interpretation thereof affecting the Contests in any way.


Modification of the Contest Rules
Global Fantasy Sports Golf™ may modify these Contest Rules, in its sole discretion,
                            by posting amended Contest Rules on the Site, or by sending an e-mail to the
                            e-mail addresses associated with registered Users. Such notice shall be effective
                            immediately after it is posted or e-mailed, as applicable; provided, however, that no
                            such modification or termination shall affect Prizes that are pending, or that have already
                            been awarded, as of the date of the modification or termination notice, as applicable.
                            If any such modification is unacceptable to you, your only recourse is to cease
                            participating as a Contest Entrant.












Thank you for your interest. The games will be available soon.

















